











































whitepaper
envion mobile mining

maximizing the value  
of energy worldwide

revised 2017-12-14



 Legal Disclaimer 3
 Abstract 4
 ICO 5
	 	 6	 Restrictions	For	Investors 
	 	 6	 Tokens
	 	 7	 Use	Of	Proceeds

 Global Energy Framework 9
	 	 9	 Digital	Energy	Consumption

	 	 10	 Global	Electricity	Market

	 	 12	 Summary

 The envion Approach 13
	 	 13	 Our	Vision
	 	 14	 Unique	Selling	Proposition
	 	 15	 Operating	Models
	 	 17	 Scalability

 The Mobile Mining Unit 18
	 	 20	 envion	Mining	Worker
	 	 24	 envion	Mining	Rack
	 	 26	 Cooling	System	&	Heat	Management
	 	 29	 envion	Sensor	Arrays

	 Our	Software	Infrasturcture	 31
	 	 32	 Unified	Unit	Control
	 	 34	 Unified	Mining	Cloud

 Security 40
 Remote Monitoring & Maintenance 45
 Mining Excellence 45
	 	 49	 Hardware	Optimization	Process
	 	 50	 Smart	Mining	Operations

 Company Structure 53
	 	 53	 Team
	 	 54	 History

 Glossary 55
	 References	 57
 Appendix 58

TABLE OF CONTENTS



3

LEGAL DISCLAIMER 

The	purpose	of	this	White	Paper	is	to	present	envion,	its	technology,	business	model	
and	the	EVN	token	to	potential	token	holders	in	connection	with	the	proposed	ICO.	
The	 information	 set	 forth	 below	may	 not	 be	 exhaustive	 and	 does	 not	 imply	 any	
elements	of	 a	 contractual	 relationship.	 Its	 sole	purpose	 is	 to	provide	 relevant	and	
reasonable	 information	 to	potential	 token	holders	 in	order	 for	 them	 to	determine	
whether	to	undertake	a	thorough	analysis	of	the	company	with	the	intent	of	acquiring	
EVN	Tokens.	All	relevant	legal	information	is	contained	in	the	Token	Purchase	Terms	
and	the	Token	Purchase	Agreement.

This	White	Paper	does	not	constitute	an	offer	to	sell	or	a	solicitation	of	an	offer	to	buy	
a	security	in	any	jurisdiction	in	which	it	is	unlawful	to	make	such	an	offer	or	solicitation.	
Neither	the	Swiss	FINMA	nor	the	United	States	Securities	and	Exchange	Commission	
nor	any	other	foreign	regulatory	authority	has	approved	an	investment	in	the	tokens.

The	EVN	token	can	be	categorized	as	a	security	as	it	entitles	token	holders	to	receive	
the	profits	from	mining	operations.	The	token	is,	as	such,	subjectto	certain	restrictions	
under	US	security	laws.	The	envion	ICO	is	compliant	with	these	rules	and	restricts	
access	for	US-citizens,	greencard	holders	and	residents	of	the	US	to	the	category	of	
“accredited	investors”,	pursuant	to	the	US	Security	Act	Regulation	D	Rule	506	(4).	All	
relevant	legal	information	is	contained	in	the	Token	Purchase	Terms	and	the		Token	
Purchase	Agreement.		

Certain	statements,	estimates	and	financial	information	contained	herein	constitute	
forward-looking	 statements	 or	 information.	 Such	 forward-looking	 statements	 or	
information	concern	known	and	unknown	risks	and	uncertainties,	which	may	cause	
actual	events	or	results	to	differ	materially	from	the	estimates	or	the	results	implied	
or	expressed	in	such	forward-looking	statements.

This	 English-language	 White	 Paper	 is	 the	 primary	 official	 source	 of	 information	
about	 the	 EVN	 token.	 The	 information	 contained	 herein	 may	 be	 translated	 into	
other	languages	from	time	to	time	or	may	be	used	in	the	course	of	written	or	verbal	
communications	with	existing	and	prospective	community	members,	partners,	etc.	
In	 the	course	of	a	 translation	or	communication	 like	this,	 some	of	 the	 information	
contained	in	this	paper	may	be	lost,	corrupted	or	misrepresented.	The	accuracy	of	
such	alternative	communications	cannot	be	guaranteed.	In	the	event	of	any	conflicts	
or	 inconsistencies	between	such	 translations	and	communications	and	this	official	
English-language	 White	 Paper,	 the	 provisions	 of	 the	 original	 English-language	
document shall prevail



4

ABSTRACT

When cryptomining was still in its infancy, it was well distributed among a couple of thousand 
private miners, governed by transparent rules and not harmful to the climate because its 
energy requirements were microscopic. All that has changed: the exponential growth 
of cryptocurrencies has led to a dramatic increase in the sector’s energy consumption 
and a concentration of mining activities in countries with low social and environmental 
standards - where electricity is produced using predominantly fossil fuels. Even worse, the 
concentration of mining power in the hands of a couple of large corporations is distorting 
the formerly democratic decision-making process in these networks: changes in protocols 
and hard forks are in danger of being influenced by the economic interests of a few.

Envion has developed a system of Mobile Mining Units (MMUs) that can tap electricity 
directly at the source: at hydro, solar, wind and fossil power plants in every corner of the 
planet. Our MMUs are based on standard intermodal (sea) containers, equipped with 
mining hardware, communication and industry 4.0 automation features, remote control 
capabilities and a break-through cooling system that only makes up ~1% of the system‘s total 
energy consumption. Altogether it’s a high-tech solution that can be seamlessly deployed 
globally and allows us to use the cleanest and cheapest energy mix wherever it is available. 

The flexibility of the MMU system helps us to fuse two of the most important sectors of 
the 21st century: blockchain technology and renewable energies. Using the dynamics of 
exponential growth for both, we promote climate preservation and the welfare of our token 
holders. It is the physical incarnation of the blockchain spirit: a robust and decentralized 
system that can withstand disruptions in government policies, price structures and the 
energy supply. 

The solution envion provides has all the necessary competitive advantages, follows a 
decentralized approach and provides voting rights for an experience that has been under 
pressure from the concentration of mining power



5

ICO DETAILS

The EVN token is an ERC-20 standard-based Ethereum token. EVN tokens grant their 
holders the right to:

1 receive 100% of the earnings of our proprietary mining operation in two steps:

• 75% payed out immediately

• 25% reinvested to boost future payouts

2 receive 35% of envion‘s earnings from mining by third-party operations

3 voting and veto in important decisions of the company’s strategy

Tokens will be offered for 31 days, starting on December 15th, 2017 and ending on 
January 14th, 2018.

EVN ICO is conducted by envion - the first mobile - mining solution in the world - 
targeting energy at its very source. The offering will be open to the global public. 
Restrictions apply for residents of Germany and US-based investors.

Token Issue Volume max. 150 millions 
 tokens not distributed shall not be generated

Token	Price	at	Issue 1 USD
Distribution  83% token holders 
 10% founder team 
 5% envion AG as reserve 
 2% bounty program

Website  www.envion.org
Accepted	form	of	payment BTC, ETH, credit cards
ICO Start Date December 15, 2017, 12 PM GMT
ICO End Date January 14, 2018, 11:59 PM GMT
Discounts time period token price 
15.12 (12PM GMT) - 17.12 (11:59:59AM GMT) $0.70 
17.12 (12PM GMT) - 21.12 (11:59:59AM GMT) $0.80 
21.12 (12PM GMT) - 28.12 (11:59:59AM GMT) $0.90 
28.12 (12PM GMT) - 14.01 (11:59:59PM GMT) $1.00

Token Issue Date January 15, 2018, 12 PM GMT
Use	of	proceeds 91% Investment in Mobile Mining Units (MMUs) 
 9% Research & Development and Administration

token holder

founder team

envion AG

bounty program



6

RESTRICTIONS FOR INVESTORS
We are convinced that the global community deserves a share in the profits of crypto 
mining - not just a handful of anonymous players from oligopolistic cartels in authoritarian 
societies. We believe that crypto mining should be a decentralized, democratic, and 
evenly distributed operation - one that is open to everyone who is willing to support the 
network and benefit from it.

Based on these principles we have created the EVN token. This grants investors the 
right to receive the full pay-out of our proprietary mining operation. As a consequence, 
the EVN token can be classified as a security in most jurisdictions. In compliance US 
security laws, holding a token is strictly limited to three categories of investors:

 • Investors who
• do not hold a US passport;

• are not in possession of a US Greencard;

• have no residence in the United States.

 • accredited investors under the US Securities Act, Regulation D, Rule 506, i.e. 
investors with a networth of more than $1m, excluding their primary residence, 
or with a net income of more than $200.000 (if married a combined income of 
$300.000).

 • investors whose residency lies in Germany are limited to investments above 
200.000€.

SEC guidelines concerning Regulation D, Rule 506(c) demand that the issuer undertakes 
„reasonable steps“ to secure that investors meet the above mentioned criteria. In the 
envion ICO we apply the SEC safe harbour verification: investors have to submit a 
scanned confirmation by a securities attorney or certified public accountant that the 
investor is indeed verified as accredited. If such confirmation is not submitted funds 
already transferred shall be remitted to the investors wallet or bank account.

These restrictions on holding tokens contradict our idea of giving everyone a fair chance 
to participate in our crypto-mining operation and the competitive advantages of the 
Mobile Mining Unit (MMU) system. However, we have to comply with security laws and 
regulations. In order to reconcile these regulations with our concept of fairness, we are 
already working hard to turn the token into a publicly tradable asset. Right after the ICO, 
envion will begin preparing a prospectus, register with the SEC and apply for a listing 
as a security token on regulated exchanges. Afterward, the EVN token will finally be 
accessible for everyone - provided the SEC gives the green light.

TOKENS
EVN Tokens are based on the ERC20 protocol, which determines that up to 150 million 
tokens will be issued with a nominal price of $1. The final allocation is set up as follows:

 • 83% investors

 • 10% founders

 • 5% envion company, e.g. for the remuneration of a dvisors, etc.

 • 2% bounty program



7

Any tokens not allocated to investors, founders or the company shall not be created. 
In other words the maximum token number can never exceed 150 million, whereas 
investors participate with 83% or a maximum of 124,500,000 tokens, founders 
participate with 10% or a maximum of 15,000,000 tokens and the envion company 
holds 7% or a maximum of 10,500,000 tokens (e.g. for the remuneration of advisors).

The tokens carry voting rights. From time to time, when envion has to take strategic 
decisions regarding mining operations, the company will bring these decisions to a vote 
with token holders who have the right to veto the company’s proposals. A voting process 
will be installed based on the EVN token’s smart contract.

The tokens carry the right to receive dividends from the mining operation. Dividends 
are calculated solely on the basis of the net profit of the mining operation. They are not 
based on envion’s profit and loss statement (P&L), which might carry risks not related to 
the mining business. The envion business model for mining has two components:

1 Proprietary	Operations	(PO) where envion invests in, owns and operates the 
MMUs. Token holders are the 100% beneficiary of the earnings of proprietary 
operations.

2 Third-Party	 Operations	 (TPO) where an independent company, such as 
a utility or an investment fund, acquires the MMUs while envion operates 
them. For this operation, envion will be rewarded with a share of the mining 
revenues. 35% of the earnings of this business model will be distributed to 
token holders.

Earnings in Proprietary Operations are comprised of the total rewards minus operation 
costs: such as, but not limited to, costs for electricity, rent/land lease for containers, 
hardware replacements to ensure the continuity of envion’s mining operation (stabilize 
the MMU’s performance and counter e.g. difficulty increases or other efficiency losses 
directly connected to the mining process), depreciation and a handling fee for the 
company’s overhead). The calculation of earnings in Third-Party Operations depends 
on the agreement with the third party, but will exclude depreciation.

100% of PO and 35% of TPO will make up the fund that is ready for distribution to token 
holders. But that’s not enough in our eyes. In order to accelerate earnings growth, we 
have decided to invest one quarter of the annual earnings fund to build new MMUs and 
lay the foundation for more earnings - and for exponential growth. 

Three quarters of the earnings will be distributed immediately - and that means on a 
weekly basis

USE	OF	PROCEEDS
We have calculated the cost of the ICO (legal advice, production of promotion materials, 
staff for marketing and communication, direct marketing expenses such as social media 
space, banners, paid articles, etc.) to be $1.5m. A large portion of this amount was 
raised before we even launched our website and official pre-sale began. We expect to 
fully cover the cost of the ICO very early in November. Therefore, contributions raised 
during the core ICO will be used entirely for investments and for building the company.

91% of the core ICO funds will be used for mining hardware, the construction of MMUs 
by contractors and their deployment at locations with low energy prices. Investment 
per MMU is estimated to be between $100,000 and 150,000 at present. However, this 
could change due to changes in hardware prices and market conditions. For every $10m 
of capital raised during the core ICO, $9.1m will be invested in hardware, translating into 
73 to 91 MMUs at present conditions.



8

During the first couple of months of the roll-out, overhead and administrative expenses 
will not be fully covered by mining revenues. As such, we will reserve 9% of the capital 
raised from the ICO for the roll-out phase (administration, research & development, legal 
proceedings for token status as a publicly available security) and as a general reserve.  

It is a goal of envion to stay ahead of the competition and develop new potential ways 
of mining, increase efficiency and detect pockets of low-cost energy worldwide; to 
explore the possibility of using MMUs as an energy sink at places and in times where 
renewable energies produce overcapacities; to integrate the MMU system into smart 
grids; and finally to transform the purely mining-oriented MMU technology into a data-
center technology with much broader applications in a developing blockchain market. 
To achieve these strategic goals, envion has started a research and development (R&D) 
cooperation with the renowned German Fraunhofer Institute for Solar Energy Systems. 
The focal point of this cooperation is to assess to what extent overcapacities of solar 
grids can and will be used for MMUs, and to analyze the economic viability of relocation 
of MMUs. The budget for R&D is part of the administrative budget.

For the benefit of our investors, we plan to make the EVN token available beyond 
accredited and qualified investors for a broader public. This requires developing a 
prospectus and involves a complicated regulatory process with financial authorities in 
various jurisdictions. Our priority jurisdictions are Switzerland, the US and potentially 
the European Union. We will allocate funds from the administrative budget for this 
process as well.

SUMMARY	OF	FUNDS	USAGE

Pre-Sale	$1.5m 100% ICO budget
ICO 91% Investment in Mobile Mining Units (MMUs) 
 9% Administration, Research & Development,  
   General Reserve, Legal Proceedings for  
   Token Status as a Publicly Available Security

In the event the ICO raises a total amount of less than $7m, the use of proceeds will 
gradually shift from investment in containers towards administration and marketing. In 
this case, envion will focus on third-party business in order to maintain profitability for 
investors and deliver returns.

The use of proceeds as put forward in this White Paper is set according to a schedule 
we feel committed to. Nevertheless, circumstances, legal proceedings, and disruptions 
in crypto markets, rewards and exchange rates might arise that could force envion to 
deviate from its original schedule



9

GLOBAL ENERGY FRAMEWORK

THE CHALLENGE
The crypto mining business model is highly dependent on the energy supply. The 
price and availability of electric power are the two most important factors for mining 
companies.

On a macro level, the hunt for cheap energy has lead to a concentration of mining 
operations in countries with low socio-economic and environmental standards, and 
therefore cheap fossil electricity. As a negative consequences of this low-cost, “dirty” 
energy, the mining of cryptocurrencies significantly contributes to climate change. 
The concentration of mining operations in a few authoritarian countries meanwhile, 
undermines the distributed ledger system and increases the risk of manipulations.

On a micro level, miners have become vulnerable to energy price fluctuations and 
regulatory changes. The competitive advantage of many companies in this sector 
depends on the willingness of a handful of regimes to tolerate cryptocurrencies, keep 
energy prices low and maintain friendly regulations. That is, obviously, the business 
model of an industry in its early stages.

Next generation mining operations will be climate friendly, more resilient against local 
price fluctuations and regulatory changes, more profitable and more decentralized. 
Consequently envion’s technology-driven business model, which combines green 
energy sources with economic viability on a global scale, is part of this next generation.

DIGITAL	ENERGY	CONSUMPTION
The IT ecosystem is one of the largest consumers of electricity worldwide. It consumes 
about 1,500 TWh per year of electricity – enough to equal the power generated by 
Germany and Japan combined - or almost 10% of the electricity generated worldwide1. 
Within the sector, cloud computing alone accounts for 416 TWh2,3, roughly equivalent 
to the carbon footprint of the entire aviation industry, and it is growing fast: cloud 
computing doubles its energy consumption every four years. By 2020, it will grow to 
1,400 TWh annually and could surpass China and the US, the world’s biggest electricity 
consumers, by 2030. Within the next decade, electricity might become a scarce 
resource, putting upward pressure on prices, if not globally then in certain places at 
certain times. The source of this bottleneck is the grid rather than power generation4.

The fastest growing application in cloud computing is cryptocurrency mining. The 
amount of energy consumed by Bitcoin and Ethereum exploded within seven years 
from virtually zero in 2010 to 19.2 TWh in 2017 – matching the energy produced by 
Iceland or Puerto Rico 5. The energy efficiency of ASICs and GPUs has risen quickly, 
but it has been outpaced by the increase in transactions and market cap. While this 
exponential growth provides excellent opportunities for miners to earn rewards, the 
power consumed by the information technology ecosystem also increases competition 
for energy. Only those with safe access to affordable electricity can put their chips to 
work.



10

GLOBAL ELECTRICITY MARKET
Unlike coal, oil and LNG, which can all be shipped around the world, there is no 
global market for electricity. The electricity market is highly fragmented, consisting of 
thousands of regional subsystems in various jurisdictions where overcapacities alternate 
with shortages. While global energy demand continues to grow dramatically, huge 
differences remain between industrialized countries and the rest of the world. In its 
International Energy Outlook 2016 the US Energy Information Agency (EIA) projects 
an increase of global electricity consumption by 69% within three decades, from 21.6 
trillion kWh in 2012 to 36.5 trillion kWh in 2040. While the demand for electricity in 
OECD countries will increase by a total of 38%, demand in non-OECD countries will 
double – reflecting the difference in GDP growth of 2.0% for OECD and 4.2% for non-
OECD countries.6

Some of this growth in demand will be met by electricity generated from fossil fuels, but 
renewables will increase their share of the energy mix from 25% to 33% between 2012 
and 2040 and double their output in absolute terms. Viewed over a period of 28 years, 
this does not appear to be disruptive. Disruption, however, is happening within the sector. 
On a global scale, 90% of all renewable energy is hydropower, which will – due to natural 
limitations – grow only marginally. That implies that all of the remaining growth will be 
contained in the non-hydro sector, i.e. wind and solar. The amount of photovoltaic electricity 
generated - private and utility scale - has grown exponentially from 100.000 MWp in 2012 
to 390.000 in 2017. In other words, the fastest growing source of the global electricity 
supply over the next two decades will be the most unreliable and volatile source - and will 
depend on weather conditions that even supercomputers cannot predict. This will have far-
reaching repercussions: governments trying to stabilize energy markets will impose more 
regulations, and electricity prices will become distorted with large deviations between 
countries, energy sources and customer categories. In consequence, price volatility is 
growing as a result of both the laws of nature and government intervention.

These volatile conditions will prevail throughout the transitional period from a world 
powered by fossil fuels and centralized energy production to one where decentralized, 
renewable sources prevail. Over the long term, the global electricity market will be 
governed by new technologies to balance, store and trade energy between multiple 
intelligent - probably blockchain-driven - actors that can create a much better equilibrium 
than regulation could ever achieve.

With this in mind, flexible players will be able to cope best with this new energy world.

PRICE	DISTORTIONS	&	OPPORTUNITIES
Photovoltaic (PV) is the fastest-growing renewable energy source, a reflection of the 
decline of module prices – from $76 USD per Watt peak (Wp) in 1977 to $0.35 USD 
in 2017. This collapse in prices was initially driven by technological improvements and 
then accelerated as a result of attractive feed-in tariffs, economies of scale and Chinese 
competition. Meanwhile, feed-in tariffs followed the drop in module prices:  1 kWh of 
PV energy generated earned $0.40 USD in 2005, while it currently earns $0.08 USD/
kWh in most OECD countries. Beginning in the planet’s sun belt, country after country 
reached grid parity in the last couple of years, i.e. solar power became as cheap as 
power from the grid (production cost + transport and levies). This process has gone 
even further. In India, Chile and the Middle East, PV plants get paid as little as $0.03 to 
$0.04 Cents (USD) per kWh generated, which is only a slightly more than the price of 
dirty coal power.



11

While the average price of PV power is already low, certain conditions in the spot market 
can drive them even lower, sometimes into negative territory. The very nature of wind 
and solar power, the drivers of renewable growth, puts pressure on the existing power 
infrastructure and has severe consequences for national grids and price structures. 
Power input fluctuates with the weather and sunlight and leads to overcapacities on sunny 
afternoons or scarcities during calm nights. In other words, the massive expansion of wind 
and solar creates opportunities for extremely low prices per kWh.

EXAMPLES

 • California. On a sunny spring day, the state produces so much solar energy 
that utility companies have to give away gigawatts of solar power, even paying 
neighboring states to accept it7.

 • Germany.	A similar overcapacity occurs when a storm hits Germany’s northern 
shores and on- and off-shore windfarms go into overdrive, producing excess 
capacity for Poland and France.

 • Chile.	Here, power prices have not been hit by forces of nature, but by the economic 
cycle. In Chile’s Atacama desert, the place with the highest intake of solar energy per 
square meter on earth, the government promoted PV plants to provide electricity 
for the large mining industry in the north. When the commodity supercycle petered 
out after 2012 due to a slowdown in Chinese demand, electricity prices collapsed 
and PV plants with a break-even of $0.14 USD/kWh are selling at $0.04 USD now

 • India.	PPV capacity increased tenfold from 300 MWp in 2010 to 3000 MWp in 
2017, creating excess capacities at certain times and a collapse in electricity prices8. 
This collapse applies to renewable as well as fossil fuels. Meanwhile, 1 kWh is on the 
market for $0.03 to $0.04 USD, and sometimes falls to $0.00 USD, especially in 
remote areas where energy demand is low.

While electricity prices in non-OECD countries are under pressure, the picture is much 
more diverse in the OECD. European OECD countries introduced a range of taxes and 
levies on electricity prices – partly to finance legacy PV-projects that earn $0.20 to $0.40 
Euro USD/kWh for the next 10 to 15 years and partly to develop the grid and finance new 
power lines for renewable energies. Consumers in Denmark and Germany pay up to $0.30 
and $0.40 USD/kWh, while power production at the source costs $0.03 USD for coal or 
gas and $0.08 USD for the latest PV parks. Simultaneously, governments have introduced 
large exemption schemes in order to preserve the competitiveness of their industries so 
that smelters or car manufacturers can still purchase low-cost energy.

The regulatory regime of legacy feed-in tariffs, subsidies and exemptions has distorted 
the market and is highly vulnerable to policy changes. The European Commission, for 
example, has targeted Germany’s exemption system as a violation of European competition 
regulations and could even force the government to change it. Furthermore, social 
institutions are putting pressure on a system that favors the interests of large companies 
over those of small consumers with lower incomes. Price changes could therefore come 
overnight - in both directions.

The European Union, India, Chile and the Middle East are only some examples of the 
distortions, risks and opportunities that affect the global electricity landscape. Our survey 
demonstrates that these markets are undergoing a deep change that will force energy 
consumers to adapt within relatively short time frames.



12

SUMMARY
The exponential growth of energy consumption in the IT ecosystem is hitting an energy 
market in transition. The growth of renewables in the energy mix is creating imbalances 
in the grid – an uneven distribution of power in time and space. At certain times and 
in certain places, there is an abundance of electricity straining the grid to its limits, 
while scarcity might prevail at other times. These imbalances trigger large fluctuations in 
spot market energy prices, regulatory responses, and price differences between sectors, 
regions, time and climate zones.

As data centers are long term investments in infrastructure, they have a limited capability 
to adapt to changes in the price structure of energy markets. Once built, they are tied 
to their location and might lose competitiveness to other locations if price structures 
change. While new market conditions might be lethal for traditional data centers, they 
offer vast opportunities for the global, flexible and smart mining operation that envion 
is launching now.



13

THE ENVION APPROACH

OUR VISION 
We believe that system innovation is imperative in order for cryptocurrencies to gain 
mass acceptance. We believe that future mining operations need to be decentralized to 
reduce their dependency on regulations from single governments, powerful individuals, 
and fossil or nuclear energy.

Future crypto-mining operations need to reduce the systemic risks that result from being 
bound to certain coins or mining pools. Thus, envion strives to hand the decisive power back 
to the crypto-community. It must be possible for individuals to take part in crypto-mining 
without tremendous investments in hardware and technology. Besides broad ownership of 
mining operations, envion strives to involve the community in making decisions about key 
mining decisions. We therefore strive to reduce the hurdles for larger audiences to take 
part in the crypto-community. 

By offering anyone the ability to take part in securing the future of the blockchain 
technology, envion is laying the foundation for the future of crypto mining by designing 
highly mobile low-maintenance mining units and by offering our community the right to 
vote for mining locations and for coin choices. 

OUR	APPROACH	
The technology that envion has developed represents the next generation of data 
centers — modular, mobile, flexible, low-maintenance, data-driven and therefore 
designed for the challenges of the future.

Our flexibility strategy is based on three technologies:

 • Our	decentralized	Mobile	Mining	Units	(MMUs) offer industry 4.0 automation 
with little maintenance, are completely modular and have a scalable design. They 
manage a variety of electricity sources and are able to adapt to different climate 
zones. Built in a 20ft standard intermodal container, they have a proprietary, 
highly efficient and failsafe cooling system, an intake of more than 100 KW 
(depending on configuration) and can turn energy into cryptocurrencies or 
alternative data applications (for details see The Mobile Mining Unit, page 18).

 • Our	 central	 hub	 or	 Unified	 Mining	 Cloud	 (UMC) manages the automated, 
decentralized operation of mobile mining units worldwide. It supports our Mobile 
Mining Units (MMUs) in finding the optimal mining strategy depending on the 
traded price of the cryptocurrency, mining difficulty, real-time energy price at 
location, hardware generation and many more factors. Besides data aggregation, 
control and optimization of MMUs, our UMC is also handling and supervising all 
service & maintenance operations throughout the envion network.

 • Our	global	Smart	Energy	Sourcing	(SES) identifies and secures locations with 
low energy prices. It is a database that we develop in a continuous process in 
cooperation with one of the most renowned scientific institutions for renewable 
energies in Germany. It combines knowledge of price structures for industrial 
users, feed-in tariffs for renewables, discounts for on-site consumption, grid 
fees, taxes, levies and exemptions - a proprietary, multidimensional system that 



14

helps us to identify the most efficient locations for processing data and mining 
cryptocurrencies.

Together, MMUs, UMC and SES build a complementary system: SES software helps us 
to identify the most efficient renewable energy sources around the globe, while the 
MMU technology allows us to direct computing power to exactly these spots in order 
to build a decentralized and robust system that turns geographical flexibility into global 
cost leadership.

The global cost leadership of envion relies on an exceptional data-based capability: 
with the help of SES we don’t just identify attractive energy environments by country. 
We zoom into the micro level to find the most efficient grid locations - directly at a 
transformer, a wind farm or a PV park. Furthermore, we know exactly whether the 
jurisdiction allows this on-site approach to avoid grid fees, levies and taxes on energy 
transportation. This surgical precision exploits the imbalances of the existing energy 
system

UNIQUE	SELLING	PROPOSITION
Envion has developed a fully automatized (“industry 4.0”), mobile mining unit inside 
CSC-certified intermodal (sea) containers that can be shipped to any location around 
the world within days (most transport routes) or weeks (transport between continents).

Lowest	price	for	energy	on	the	market. Our mining units use low-priced green energy 
directly at the source - near the shore, in the desert or in other remote locations. This 
allows us to always strategically position our Mobile Minings Units (MMUs) in regions 
with a competitive supply of energy and provides us with leverage when negotiating 
with energy providers.

Maximum	energy	efficiency. Our mobility concept allows targeted placement of our 
mobile mining units at sites where thermal energy is required - for heating buildings, 
greenhouses or warehouses. This way, we “recycle” the energy used for mining. With 
this strategy, we achieve revolutionary, low electricity prices.

Cutting-edge	cooling	technology. We have designed, developed and tested a radically 
new, self-regulating cooling system specifically designed for the blockchain mining 
industry. This patent-pending cooling system achieves a best-in-class energy efficiency 
with a consumption of only ~1% of the system’s total energy consumption.

True	scalability.	Mass production & scalability has been deeply embedded into envion’s 
DNA from day one. Next to custom components developed by envion (e.g. circuit 
boards for management or cooling systems), our Mobile Mining Units use a wide range 
of standardized components that facilitate the mass production. Our investment in 
software is safeguarding our growth trajectory by providing the necessary means to 
operate a large fleet of MMUs. Through our network of partner firms, we have been 
able to secure a prioritized access to components such as GPUs in large quantities.

Risk	mitigation	by	design. According to recent benchmarking studies, the centralization 
of hashing power in the hands of a few is a risk universally perceived as high by 
large- and small-scale miners9. However since envion is able to “mine” a broad set of 
cryptocurrencies, our mobile mining units reduce this concentration of power, as well 
as the dependency on a single government (e.g. regulatory changes), single energy 
providers (e.g. energy shortages or rapid price increases) and single cryptocurrencies 
(e.g. crash of single cryptocurrency).

Supporting	the	smart	grid.  Our mobile mining units are designed and built to operate at 



15

remote locations (“industry 4.0”) near energy sources such as solar plants, wind turbines 
or hydropower plants. Our mobile mining units can be integrated into a smart grid and 
flexibly take the load off of energy grids. 

The pivotal parameter for cryptomining is the electricity price, where rewards and the 
depreciation of hardware are similar for every market participant. For commercial miners, 
the cost of data center infrastructure is equally important. We at envion have addressed 
both of these cost drivers with our concept of Mobile Mining Units: it is a modular, 
simple, robust and highly cost-efficient framework for any data center operation with 
the flexibility and standardized size required for a global deployment strategy.

OPERATING	MODELS
We apply the combination of our Smart Energy Sourcing (SES) and our Mobile Mining 
Units (MMUs) in two business models: Proprietary Mining Operations (PMO) and Third-
Party Operations (TPO):

PROPRIETARY	MINING	OPERATIONS	(PMO)
We produce, own and operate a fleet of proprietary MMUs. Our margin is the margin 
after rewards, depreciation and energy prices. CAPEX is on envion’s shoulders, financed 
by our ICO investors. In turn, token holders are entitled to 100% of the earnings - 
of which envion re-invests 25% in order to increase envion’s future market share and 
maximize future earnings growth. 

Distribution of these dividends will occur on a weekly basis whereas 75% of profits will 
be emitted and 25% will be used to reinvest directly in MMUs in order to deliver growing 
dividends to the envion community. MMUs will remain active as long as the operation 
is profitable. 

In an MMU setup with a combination of 50% ASIC- and 50% GPU miners, the total 
ROI of envion’s proprietary mining operations is 181% (calculated on Nov. 24th 2017). 
A detailed overview of the underlying assumptions as well as profit and cost drivers on 
can be found in the appendix.

While Proprietary Operations are highly profitable in itself, they also serve as a proof 
of concept that should help turn utilities (e.g. power plant operators) into clients. At 
this point, we are currently already engaged in discussions with planners & operators 
of power plants that have approached envion. Their interest lies in the operation of 
envion’s Mobile Mining Units (MMUs) as part of a downstream vertical integration to 
safeguard their profitability in a difficult energy market environment.

THIRD-PARTY	OPERATIONS	(TPO)
In Third-Party-Operations, MMUs are manufactured and maintained by envion, but the 
investment is carried by external partners, the “third parties”. A third party can be an 
investment fund or a corporation seeking an upgrade in its profitability. By refining 
electricity, a mere commodity, into sophisticated crypto-mining services the corporation 
moves up the value chain and multiplies its revenues per kWh. With TPO, we offer our 
expertise in mobile crypto mining to a sector in need of revenues, leverage our own 
capital base and increase returns for token holders. A percentage of the total mining 
revenues of the third party will be claimed by envion for operating the MMUs and 
envion will pay 35% of the resulting earnings to token holders.



16

CHALLENGES IN THE BLOCKCHAIN COMMUNITY
The ecological footprint of traditional mining operations is enormous – the total amount 
of energy consumed in mining Ethereum and Bitcoin is as large as Nigeria’s consumption, 
a country with 180 million inhabitants, about 2% of the entire population on earth. The 
Guardian stated back in July that a single Bitcoin transaction “devours as much energy 
as what powers 1.57 US households for a day – roughly 5,000 times more energy-
hungry than a typical credit card payment”10. Traditional large- and small-scale mining 
operations get their power from regular grids - based on a traditional energy mix. On 
a global level, that energy mix is still dominated by fossil fuels contributing to pollution 
and climate change. For blockchain to fulfill its own vision and become the infrastructure 
for transactions in the future, the technology needs to improve its energy consumption 
profile while maintaining its core principles: the distributed ledger and a redundancy of 
capacities. That is a big challenge for the entire industry. However we - the envion team 
- are convinced that we can help make the world a better place with our mobile and 
flexible system which taps unused resources in the renewable space.

Besides our environmental ambitions we want to strengthen the original idea of 
blockchain and crypto currencies: a distributed structure in the hands of many as 
opposed to oligopolistic clusters of computing power in intransparent jurisdictions 
under authoritarian rule. The very nature of our mobile fleet of MMUs allows for a 
widely distributed system and the voting rights we give to the community of token 
holders ensure that important decisions in mining are taken by the community and not 
by tycoons

LONG TERM VISION
We believe that next generation energy grids need to be intelligent, dynamic systems 
connecting legacy power stations with large scale renewables and networks of 
distributed producers and consumers of energy. On the last mile, such a system relies 
on Advanced Metering Infrastructure (AMI) with smart meters as energy managers 
and intelligent machines as agents that buy and sell energy via smart contracts, using 
household’s solar roofs as power stations and car batteries as storage. In the energy 
world 4.0, the formerly uninvolved consumer of the 20th century becomes an active 
player in a breathing and flexible energy organism, managed by smart contracts, paid in 
cryptocurrencies11.

In such a world, the analysis of energy prices on a global scale is key for efficient crypto 
mining and data center operations9. With Smart Energy Sourcing (SES), we are now 
laying the foundations for the software infrastructure necessary to manage our crypto 
mining operation and maximize the potential and flexibility of our Mobile Mining Units 

Figure	1.	Scalability. Containers can be stacked in arrays to allow the best usage of available space and 
maintain  an outstandingly small footprint for a comparable data center.



17

in order to become the leading player in the emerging world of blockchain-based energy 
transactions.

SCALABILITY 
According to a recent Cambridge study, many large miners are highly concerned with 
issues regarding the scalability of their operations. We designed our processes with this 
issue in mind, resulting in an all-around highly scalable concept. We deploy a modified, 
ISO-certified sea container that is adapted to suit envion’s needs right from the beginning. 
In partnership with well-established Chinese steel factories, all of the container’s units 
are thoroughly prepared and equipped with most of the required hardware, including 
envion’s proprietary sensor array, remote control mechanisms and envion’s hardware 
stacking system. At this point, envion’s units can be filled with the computing hardware. 
Currently this step is undertaken in the EU, however we have plans for passing it on to 
production sites in the future as well. After this final step, which is facilitated by envion’s 
simple hardware stacking system, the unit can be connected and can start working 
anywhere in the world, be it in a remote power plant, rural industrial area or even a 
container ship, using the ship’s onboard wifi and power supply. Our team of international 
energy experts has furthermore helped us to create a power hub that allows envion’s 
modular data centers to be connected to virtually any high-power electricity in the 
world. Accepting the industrial standard of 380-400 VAC via a set of adjustable 
connectors, envion’s fleet remains flexible, can be used in any imaginable setting and 
can be dynamically adjusted to meet the required needs. In the post-deduction phase, 
a unit can even be economically used to solely transform excess energy such as excess 
power potentials from (off-grid) renewable energy sources.

Given the low prices of standardized grid-tied inverters, PV farms often use these 
standard modules in an array, creating an ideal low-voltage AC network for off-grid 
usage of PV power. After the primary amortization phase, where units are in use 24-7, a 
100% off-grid use case becomes profitable.



18

THE MOBILE MINING UNIT (MMU)

DEVELOPMENT	PRINCIPLES
The envion team has developed the core technology ranging from circuit boards to 
middleware to application software layers for the MMU based upon a clear set of 
development principles and guidelines:

 • Mobility. The envion vision can only be realized by ensuring that each and every 
component is compatible with, and supports, our ruggedized mobility concept 
(e.g. protection of hardware components against vibrations and transport-
related issues). This is largely realized by using components designed and revised 
in-house. See “Scalability” , page 17 for details.

 • Modularity. For the sake of scalability, modularity is one of envion’s fundamental 
design strategies. The modularization of functional units and the creation of a 
completely modular environment are essential contributors to the sUUCess of 
our Mobile Mining Unit (MMU). See “Envion Mining Rack” , page 24 for details.

 • Cost-efficiency. The highest-performance device does not always provide the 
best value when energy cost is a factor. Our goal is to create devices with the 
greatest ROI at the lowest overall risk. The core technology of the MMU has 
been developed to only include carefully chosen, well-engineered solutions with 
a clear focus on improved ROI over the life of the device.

 • Maintainability.	Keeping operational costs low is the key to sUUCess. Industry 
4.0-driven automation approaches are therefore preferred over using human 
resources for maintenance. See “Smart Maintenance Concept”, page 46 for 
details.

 • Plug‘n‘play.	Replacing, removing, adding, or moving units and devices should not 
affect the operability of the system or any parts of it. To this end, a sophisticated 
plug‘n‘play system should be designed to track and balance connected 
components.

 • Plug‘n‘mine.	A fundamental development concept is that deployment of the 
MMU to full-scale mining should only take a few minutes once energy and 
network have been connected. Simply plug in the device and mining will rapidly 
commence following the sequential startup sequence.

 • Expandability.	Simple, straightforward, function-based engineering allows for 
exponential scalability, allowing for virtually unlimited expansion of our system. 
This ensures easy-to-control mass production and a short time-to-market.

 • Cooling	optimization.	Cooling is an essential factor for any data-center and is 
the greatest component in determining its efficiency. A maintainable and error-
proof system is the key to an autonomous mining operation. Therefore, we have 
created a largely passive, highly-efficient cooling system that keeps the unit 
running even at outside temperatures above 40 °C. For special purposes, like 
hot climates, this system will be scalable without additional adaption (see chapter 
“Automated Cooling System”, page 27).



19

SYSTEM	OVERVIEW
Based on a fully ISO-certified 20ft intermodal (sea) container, our mining unit represents 
a highly mobile crypto-miner that universally fits into internationally standardized 
transportation systems. Our design and engineering experts have made every effort to 
maintain the unit’s flexibility with regard to stacking and arranging multiple units to create 
an easily-accessible data center array. The sea container design assures cost-effective 
logistics by giving access to standardized international transportation and storage systems. 
Our strictly modular design allows for physical stacking and parallel connection of several 
units.

Even at the container’s maximum gross weight, our units can be moved and stacked freely 
by means of simple fork-lift trucks that are capable of lifting 3 tons of weight.

The Mobile Mining Unit (MMU) is contained within and includes the sea container, along 
with the complete system of racks, doorman, satellite-communication, relays, energy 
measurement & safety devices, mining optimization and central management system 
(UUC), remote control units and networking infrastructure for secure communication & 
uplink. 

Based on industry 4.0 standards, our goal for the first generation of the MMU was that 
it can work autonomously and therefore can be placed anywhere in the world. The only 
requirement for the MMU to begin operation is energy.

Upon connection to a suitable power source (see below), the MMU automatically 
searches for an internet connection via multiple failover data links including WIFI, 
LTE or satellite connections (including automatic unfolding, scanning & bearing of the 
satellite antenna to locate and connect to the appropriate satellite) with the help of the 
Automated Internet Connection (AIC). Once found, the available internet connection 
can initialize any attached envion workers (rigs and ASICs) and brings the whole MMU, 
its IP addresses, and its status monitoring of controlling system units (temperature, 
power, fan speed) online. When the workers are fully-initialized, they quickly start to 
mine and report to the envion environment.

The MMU is completely automated and does not require manual interaction for daily 
routines. All of this is achieved by modular control systems, which are connected and 

Figure	2.	System	Overview.	Zoom	in	from	Unified	Mining	Cloud	connecting	the	MMUs	to	smallest	entities.		

MMU (Mobile Mining Unit)

MMU MMU

mining rack
group 1

mining rack
group 2

mining rig 1 mining rig 2 ...

mining rack 1 ...

mining rack
group 3

mining rack
group 4

UMC



20

supervised by the UUC (Unified Unit Control). The UUC is the brain of the MMU: it 
receives the information of all associated and connected IoT devices, brings them together, 
and controls them at various levels.

ENVION	MINING	WORKER
The smallest element in envion’s ecosystem is the mining worker. This can be an ASIC, 
a GPU-based mining rig or other possible future mining or cloud-computing engines.

MINING	HARDWARE

The first generation of the envion MMU contains the envion rig, which is an optimized 
mining device configured for optimal ROI efficiency. With this goal in mind, we over- or 
underclock GPUs, test dual-mining strategies, and reduce overhead by the operating 
system. New mining configurations based on this hardware can be published to all 
running instances worldwide by our envion UMC (Unified Mining Cloud) automatically. 

More detailed information with regard to hardware optimization can be found in chapter 
Mining Excellence (page 45).

HARDWARE	MAINTENANCE

One central asset of our Mobile Mining Units is that they keep maintenance costs and 
efforts minimal. There are fully automated systems in place which detect defective rigs, 
based on IP address and rig denotations, so that any maintenance worker is able to 
locate defective hardware within a very limited amount of time. Envion is already able 
to instantly detect defective GPUs on a software basis when they stop performing 
their intended tasks at the desired performance rate. Now, we have taken a further 
step by altering BIOS names of GPUs (unique identifiers) and equipping GPUs with 
LEDs that translate software-based issue detection into physical signals, allowing even 
uninstructed maintenance workers gain the ability to quickly and reliably detect and 
replace defective hardware.

These mechanics are merely a fragment of the efforts that envion has undertaken in order 
to ensure minimal maintenance; the entire MMU has been designed so that anyone with 
a basic understanding of hardware and software processes can operate them with little 
guidance. For instance, all mining units are configured in a plug‘n‘play style, indicating that 
they start up as soon as electricity and internet connection are available. Furthermore, all 
rigs are equipped with LED strips, so that it is clearly visible when one particular section of 
an MMU loses electricity, networking or other functionality, simplifying repairs.

Generally speaking, a certain number of GPUs will stop mining after a certain amount 
of time, but there’s a simple fix for that: every MMU has a randomized reboot schedule 
which reboots the mining rigs in order to safeguard performance, minimize maintenance 
operations, reduce the load on GPUs and improve heat management. This approach is 
highly favourable in contrast to the sole remaining viable solution, which is to not bring the 
hardware to its limits, but that could lead to much lower performance, which in turn would 
lead to a lower ROI for the envion community.

On the process side, the declared goal of envion is to highly standardize all maintenance 
operations. This means that maintenance operations are guided and controlled by our 
software infrastructure that provides clear prioritization, visual guidance, effective control 
& benchmarking and escalation of all maintenance operations.



21

MMU	CONFIGURATIONS

MMUs can be configured either with traditional ASIC workers or with our proprietary 
GPU-based rigs. The patent-pending cooling system includes specific options for both, 
ASIC- and GPU-based workers, which can be installed at fixed or yet to be determined 
ratios. The main configurations are depicted below in table 1 and figure 3, where an ASIC 
worker-fraction of 0, 50, or 100 % is depicted. Due to the nature of an air-cooled system, 
we have created a “medium (power) density” (< 50 KW), a “high density” (60-85 KW) 
and an ultra-high density (137 KW; ASIC-only) MMU version for each configuration. The 
implementation of a medium-density MMU version allows deployment of our containers 
even to regions with outstandingly high ambient air temperatures. Our prototype is of 
high-power density (figure 1).

MD* HD** UHD***

100% GPU 100%	ASIC 50%/50% 100%	ASIC 100% GPU 50%/50% Prototype 100%	ASIC

No.	GPU	Workers	(pcs) 48 0 24 0 64 32 48 0

P/GPU	Worker	(W) 960 960 960 960 960 960 960 960

No.	ASIC	Workers	(pcs) 0 32 16 64 0 24 10 96

P/ASIC	Worker	(W) 1430 1430 1430 1430 1430 1430 1430 1430

P	total	GPU	(W) 46080 0 23040 0 61440 30720 46080 0

P	total	ASICS	(W) 0 45760 22880 91520 0 34320 14300 137280

P	aux.	Eq.	(W) 800 800 800 800 800 800 800 800

P	TOTAL	(W) 46880 46560 46720 92320 62240 65840 61181 138080

No.	CEE	32A	Power	Lines 3 3 3 5 4 4 4 7

*MD = Medium Power Density version.  
**HD = High Power Density version. 
***UHD = Ultra High Density version. 100 % ASIC workers.

 

Table	1:	MMU	configurations.	Different configurations of our MMUs with ASIC and GPU workers are pre-
sented. Representative configurations of 100% GPU workers, 100% ASIC workers and a 50/50 mix (based on 
power consumption) were chosen and are compared in the above table.



22

Figure	3.	MMU	configurations.	Representative drawings of our different MMU configurations demonstra-
ting configurations with A) 100 % ASIC workers, B) 100 % GPU workers, C) a combination of ASIC and GPU 
workers. D) 100 % ASIC workers in UHD configuration. 

A) 
100%	ASIC

B) 
100% GPU

C) 
ASIC/GPU

D) 
ASIC	UHD



23

SOFTWARE

To ensure unprecedented performance, we created our own envion operating system 
(EOS) to run on our mining rigs. EOS is Linux-based and optimized for low overhead, high 
performance, scalability, and stability. 

Whenever a system is brought online, it initially receives an IP address from the network. 
Based on a configurable URL, it sends initial status information on startup which registers 
the envion rig in the ecosystem (see UUC - Unified Unit Control, page 32). EOS updates the 
ecosystem in frequent intervals. The operating system is furthermore able to recognize 
GPU failures and can set LED indicators to support maintenance work. If a GPU fails, EOS 
instantly pushes messages to the network in the standardized envion communication 
format (ECF). With the help of an integrated, secured REST-API, the mining rig is able to 
receive additional information and instructions.

These details ensure that an envion rig is completely modular, including its EOS. This 
means that wherever an envion rig is installed, it will start connecting to the network, send 

Figure	4.	envion	operating	system	(EOS)

envion OS

Linux kernel

Figure	5.	envion	RIG	REST	API



24

information and statuses, and begin to take up the work.

The envion rig receives frequent software updates, ensuring that it adheres to the best 
performing mining strategies by default. Of course, this can be interrupted and changed on 
each rig as defined and requested by the UMC (see Unified Mining Cloud, page 34).

The process of flashing the EOS onto the new SSDs used for the envion rig is done during 
the build-pipeline. This semi-automated process can be massively scaled to meet the 
requirements of any particular application of the mining system. When the EOS is started, 
it automatically sends requests to the UMC cloud for newer versions of EOS and will begin 
updating.

ENVION MINING RACK
All racks are designed to meet the central goal of maximizing the gross energy efficiency 
of the whole unit. This involves optimizing arrangement of the different components at 
defined heights inside the racks, allowing for optimal airflow through the air ducts to 
reach all components that require cooling. 

MODULARITY

Each envion rack has its own power supplies, relays, network switches, and mining 
workers which make each rack completely independent and interchangeable. This way 
the rack can be assembled independently of its location which ensures a high level of 
modularity and safety. 

Racks in a Mobile Mining Unit can furthermore be readily exchanged or replaced. This 
ensures a scalable-build pipeline and that only minimal knowledge is required for physical 
installation, as only network and energy need to be connected to the rack to allow the 
mining process to begin.

EXPANDABILITY

The layers of the rack are highly expandable to match the needs of this rapidly evolving 
market. This means that the rack can be expanded for ASICs, mining rigs, or any other 
kind of hardware, such as traditional hard drives, in order for the unit to remain adaptable 
to multiple applications and use-cases. Our envion racks are designed and tested in our 
laboratory to optimize them towards maximum versatility in the field. To this end, we 
also maintain ongoing research and development to ensure continuous improvements in 
design and performance for future and already-deployed racks.

COOLING	OPTIMIZATION

Based on aerodynamic simulations, field testing in various environments, and proof-
of-concept testing under thermal-imaging control, the racks and the placement of the 
GPUs have been optimized for ideal convective conditions. This specific placement 
ensures our superior cooling performance, allowing the racks to be placed next to each 
other without losing performance to heat. 

MAINTAINABILITY

To ensure maximum flexibility and maintainability, all racks are placed on rails that 
have been welded into the container during initial production. This enables precision 
movement of the racks along the short horizontal axis of the container, allowing for an 



25

optimal adjustment of rack-to-rack distances as well as ideal positioning for maintenance.

Due to the modular design of each rack, modifications to the layout will trigger the 
envion operating system to execute automatic connection routing that ensure a seamless 
connection of the modular rack with the envion network upon connection to the power 
line.

The end result is an easily maintainable, cost-efficient, expandable rack which can be 
deployed into a Mobile Mining Unit without any on-site configuration.

Figure	6.	Cooling	system	&	arrangement	of	hardware.	Two	large	diameter	fans	decrease	pressure	inside	
the	container,	resulting	in	directional	inflow	of	cool	air	through	ventilation	ducts.	Archive	racks	on	rails	are	
used	to	host	the	hardware.

1

A

2 3 4 5 6 7 8

1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8

B

C

D

E

F

A

B

C

D

E

F

Dept. Technical reference Created by Approved by

Document type Document status

Title DWG No.

Rev. Date of issue Sheet

passive cooling / power distribution 1/1
component arrangement
mobile datacenter

ENVION AG

6050

2
4

3
0

1930

494.51

5
9

0
.3

8



26

COOLING SYSTEM & HEAT MANAGEMENT 
Our first and foremost objective is to keep our data centers as fail-safe as possible. Our 
strategy toward achieving this goal is to keep things simple, limiting the unnecessary 
introduction of error-prone components. While competitors have experimented with 
fully-liquid cooled systems, battery-backed arrangements and even water-immersed 
electronic components, we at envion have decided to design a simple yet unique air-
based cooling system. The main feature, and the competitive advantage of this cooling 
system, is its efficiency in terms of the opex (energy required) and capex cost (initial 
investment) required to remove excess heat from inside the container. This is achieved 
by its directed air-flow design, which is routed directly to the sources of heat, and the 
redundancy that is guaranteed by the use of its twin-engine system, with one engine 
being capable of compensating a complete failure of the other.

Using a state-of-the-art temperature probe array and a fail-safe stack of independent 
PID-controllers, both fan drives are simultaneously and continuously governed to run at 
the most efficient rate, determined in real time by the relative temperature and pressure 
difference between the inside and outside of the container. Humidity and water sensors 
allow identification of various weather conditions. If a container is deployed outdoors, 
severe storms or rain can be detected and the ventilation system will be adjusted so 
that no water can enter the interior of the container. As mentioned above, pressure and 
temperature sensors are able to control ambient outside and inside air temperatures, 
allowing for adjustments of the converted energy and cooling power to the required (preset) 
temperatures. In certain cases, it may be desirable to increase the operating temperature of 
the unit for external purposes, e.g. heating of a swimming pool, where water can be heated 
by running through the heated container cells. The sensors allow for such adjustments to 
be set and monitored remotely. In total, the efficiency of our mobile data center reaches a 
still unprecedented power usage effectiveness of less than 1.02.

Figure	7.	Simulation	of	heat	dissipation	by	convection	and	thermography.	 
A:	GPU	arrays	have	been	optimized	for	heat	dissipation	by	passive	ventilation.	 
B:	Thermal	images	of	a	representative	GPU	and	an	ASIC	miner	were	taken	at	thermal	equilibrium	after	60	
min	of	runtime	at	outside	ambient	temperature	of	24	°C



27

Since our Mobile Mining Units, just like all data centers, convert the largest part of their 
electrical energy consumption into heat, this, otherwise useless, thermal energy can 
directly be used in the settings depicted in table 2:

BEFORE 
MMU	DEPLOYMENT

AFTER 
MMU	DEPLOYMENT

Industrial Hall Cheap	industrial	electricity	rate MMU	connected	to	spare	transformer	station	now	deli-
vers	up	to	more	than	100	KW	of	thermal	energy	per	unitt

Spare	transformer	station(s)	available	=	unused	capacity Fossil	fuel	heating	can	be	reduced	accordingly

Heating	with	fossil	fuels	or	electricity

Warehouse,	
Shopping	Centers,	
Office	buildings

Moderate	electricity	(flat)	rates MMUs	deliver	heat	directly	to	the	building

Spare	capacity	often	available	 
in	the	order	of	50-500	KVA

Fossil	fuel	heating	can	be	reduced	accordingly

Heating	with	fossil	fuels	or	electricity

Greenhouses,	 
vertical	farming

Cheap	industrial	electricity	/	PV-derived	electricity MMU	connected	to	central	power	connection

Heating	via	“heat	boxes”	(e.g.	2-10	kW	Units) Waste	heat	used	to	heat	greenhouse

Same	power	consumption	as	before,	 
but	massive	revenues	from	MMU	mining

Converting our MMU’s waste heat into a system where thermal energy is useful provides 
savings which are directly proportional to the amount of electrical energy being converted 
by the MMU. Heating expenses, before and after installation of a MMU inside a heated 
warehouse or greenhouse, can thus be easily assessed and the savings on heating the 
building can be directly deducted from the MMU’s electricity bill. This creates another 
unique competitive advantage for the envion MMU over conventional mining farms, which 
are typically installed in remote areas and thus unable to recycle their massive amounts of 
thermal energy.

AUTOMATED	SUPPORTIVE	COMPONENTS

AUTOMATED	INTERNET	CONNECTION	(AIC)

Automatic establishment of an internet connection via satellite, LTE and/or WIFI is 
realized upon power connection. Governed by an embedded system, equipped with 
automatic startup procedures and an RSSI-guided antenna control algorithm, our 
satellite communication system supports an automatic positioning of the antenna 
towards the respective satellite position. This procedure takes under two minutes, in 
total. Additionally, a diversity antenna-equipped LTE/UMTS access point is enabled and 
results in connection of the unit, via LTE or Satellite links, to the preferred connection 
type according to the data plan presets (supporting automatic failover).

AUTOMATED	COOLING	SYSTEM	(ACS)

The ACS represents the governance mechanisms of our patent-pending cooling system 
which has been described above. The ACS runs independently of the UUC. In case of a 
controller failure, the relay-circuits are opened, resulting in the cooling system being set 
to an “on”-state, which ensures proper cooling even in the event of a controller failure. 

Table	2:	Examples	for	specific	“energy	recycling”	use	cases. Use of envion’s MMU as an electrical heating 
system in various settings, whenever constant heating of a building is required to a significant extent. About 
90% of the energy input of one MMU is directly released as clean, hot air.



28

Additionally, a hardware override to directly control the fans is installed, allowing for 
direct control of the cooling system.

AUTOMATED	DOORMAN	SYSTEM	(ADS)

The physical access door of the MMU is secured by an electrical doorman. The ADS 
is a separated system which can work without the UUC, but it does inform the UUC 
of its status and can be controlled by it. This means that the UUC can set timeframes 
with dedicated codes or one-time passcodes to open the door for a certain amount of 
time. This can be useful for timed access controls, such as to allow for maintenance by 
external maintenance workers. The system supports pass codes and RFID transponder 
cards.

AUTOMATED	SECURITY	MODULE	(ASM)

Wide-angle cameras monitor all angles of the exterior and interior of the MMU and their 
control system is known as the ASM.

The cameras store their information on Network Attached Storage (NAS). This makes the 
ASM, just like all the other systems, independent of the UUC. The UUC is able, however, 
to retrieve the information, evaluate it, and report it to other systems. In this way, cameras 
can be turned into smart monitors, allowing for video footage of the movements of people 
within and around the MMU to be monitored, transferred, and stored. Together with the 
Automated Doorman System (ADS), physical access to the MMU by maintenance workers 
can be monitored, reviewed, and controlled remotely.

Figure	8.	MMU	Security	Surveillance	System.	Broad	camera	angles	for	secure	surveillance	of	the	MMU.

container security surveillance 
system

entrance



29

ENVION SENSOR ARRAYS 

SURVEILLANCE	&	AUTOMATION

At envion, our design premise is focused on keeping the device operator’s workload as 
small as possible, resulting in minimal operational requirements related to manpower and 
user education. Tasks related to the operation of the decentralized network have been 
distributed in a simple and sensible way by pursuing a strategy of maximum automation 
of the hardware. The remaining tasks for on-site personnel are therefore limited to 
a) connecting the power supply, b) typing in the network authentication keys, and c) 
exchanging broken hardware modules upon automatic email notification.

All processes inside the unit are fully remote-monitored, leaving critical tasks such as the 
maintenance of computing units and identification of faulty components to envion’s 
specialists and computing experts.

ENVION	SENSORS	AND	REMOTE	MONITORING	CAPABILITIES

ENERGY MONITORING

	POWER	/	ENERGY	UPTAKE  COMPUTING	RIG	PERFORMANCE

TASK Incoming Gross  
Power	Moni-
toring

Single	Unit	Power	
Monitor

Single	Unit	Po-
wer Interrupt

Single Unit 
Computing	
Performance

Single Unit Core 
Temperatures

Single	Unit	Hard-	
and	Software	
modifications

SENSORS 3-phase	AC	
current	integ-
rator,	certified,	
calibrated

ACS	724	analog	
current	sensor

LAMP-server	
triggered	
Optopcoupler	
relais-array

Hardware- 
integrated

Hardware- 
integrated

Hardware- 
integrated

DATA	 
ACCESS

Real	time	data	
upload	to	secure	
unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Real	time	data	
upload	to	secure	
unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

RESTful	API	 
secured	by	
VLAN	and	
optional	SSL/
VPNl

Real	time	data	
upload	to	secure	
unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Real	time	data	
upload	to	secure	
unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Remote	 
controlled	via	
VPN/SSL- 
secured	 
PHP-based	 
remote	control	
panel

PURPOSE Internal	 
verification/	
external	billing,	
accounting

Performance/	
Efficiency	
calculations	and	
optimizations

Hardware	
restart

Micro	level	 
optimization/	
early	failure	
diagnostics

Micro	level	 
optimization/	
early	failure	
diagnostics

Micro	level	 
optimization/
early	failure	
diagnostics

Figure	9:	Custom-designed	sensor	hub.	Custom PCBs inside the central power distribution units allow preci-
se and safe integration of sensor data into the MMU’s automated workflow. 

Table	3:	Energy	Monitoring.	Power	and	Rig	Performance	Monitoring	



30

CLIMATE MONITORING

 CLIMATE-RELATED	DATA

TASK Outside temperature Outside air pressure Inside temperature 
gradient	(bottom	to	
ceiling)

Inside air pressure Inside humidity and 
metal body tempe-
rature

SENSORS Bosch	BMP	280	 
temperature	sensor

Bosch	BMP	280	
barometric	sensor

DALLAS	DS180	
1-wire	array

Bosch	BMP	280	 
temperature	sensor

DHT11	and	 
MAX6675	humidity	
and	temperature	
sensors

DATA	 
ACCESS

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Real	time	data	
upload	to	secure	
unified	unit	control	
(UUC)

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

PURPOSE Climate	and	 
performance	 
monitoring

Climate	monitoring/ 
calculation	of	air	flow

Estimation	of	cooling	
efficiencies

Climate	monitoring/ 
calculation	of	air	flow

Dewpoint	calculation/
condensation	 
avoidance

SECURITY AND SURVEILLANCE

 SECURITY	SENSORS/ACTUATORS

TASK Outside Cameras: 3x Inside Cameras: 3x Chemical Burglary 
defense	system

Electronic  
Transponder-based	
access control

UPS	Battery	Backup

SENSORS IP	Cameras,	 
waterproof	IP44

IP	Cameras confidential confidential confidential

DATA	 
ACCESS

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

Automatically	
deployed;	Remote	
controlled	via	VPN/
SSL-secured	control	
panel

Real	time	data	upload	
to	secure	unified	unit	
control	(UUC)

n/a

PURPOSE Outside	surveillance Internal	surveillance Theft	protection Remote- 
administerable	 
Access	Control

Aux.	power	unit	for	
non-mining	hardware

Table	5.	Security	&	Surveillance.	Sensors	and	actuators	for	security	and	surveillance	purposes	of	the	MMU

Table	4.	Climate	Monitoring.	Monitoring	of	inside	and	outside	temperature,	humidity	and	air	pressure	of	
the	MMU.	



31

OUR SOFTWARE INFRASTRUCTURE

SYSTEM	OVERVIEW
Our main goals for the envion software are reliability, modularity, maintainability and 
security. Due to the physical separation of the different hardware components, the system 
is split into various software components running on numerous devices. Therefore we have 
software components for the mining workers and the automated supportive components. 
We have furthermore built software running on a server system inside the MMU, called 
Unified Unit Control (UUC). The UUC is aggregating and controlling all information from 
control systems and workers inside the MMU. On top of the UUC is a cloud-based 
application called Unified Mining Cloud (UMC). The UMC aggregates information from 
UUCs and allows access to the system via multiple frontends. Frontends can be web-based 
applications or, in the future, mobile applications. To meet these requirements, all 
communication between the system is based on RESTful APIs

These fine degrees of software component separation allow us to scale quickly and to be 
able to effectively divide development between software teams. Each code base is handled 
separately and will be merged and assembled during an automated build pipeline. The 

source code is reviewed before it is accepted to increase code quality and follow modern 
development methods.

This yields high-quality source code builds which can automatically be rolled out for 
production, resulting in a very rapid time to market.

Figure	10.	Overview	of	system	architecture.

UMC Unified Mining Cloud (UMC)

frontend

MMU

workers &
components

workers &
components

UUC

MMU Mobile Mining Unit (MMU)

workers &
components

workers &
components

UUC Unified Unit Control (UUC)

workers & components



32

UNIFIED	UNIT	CONTROL	(UUC)
We have created a central system that manages all IoT devices, control systems, and 
workers (both rigs and ASICs) in the MMUs which we call envion‘s UUC.

The central unit in the MMU collects, aggregates, processes and monitors data from all 
systems at a high level. Even if the different monitoring systems are designed to work 
independently, the UUC will bring them together to form a fault-tolerant monitoring 
system, keeping track of all devices to recognize failures. Based on defined rules, it 
will handle certain events in a predefined manner. As long as the UUC has an available 
internet connection (secured by multiple failover connections) it synchronizes and 
reports all incidents to the UMC (Unified Mining Control) via REST-API.

To ensure comprehensive control and monitoring of device information, the UUC offers a 
wide range of REST-API endpoints. 

The UUC uses Java, is embedded in Docker containers and is built according to the 
standards of enterprise application development. Based on automated build-pipelines, the 
UUC will acquire updates continuously with the help of continuous delivery. This ensures 
stable and fast release cycles. The source code is hosted on GitHub and portions of it will 
become public to enhance the quality of the software by supporters and contributors. 

AUTOMATED	INITIALIZATION

To meet the modularity and flexibility requirements, the internal network of an MMU 
is completely dynamic. All workers (rigs and ASICs) and other devices request an IP 
address when they are connected to a new network (DHCP) for the first time. Directly 
afterwards, the rigs and devices send their status, IP address and additional information 
to the UUC. The UUC then creates a virtual map of IP addresses and devices based 
on this information. This map is regularly updated whenever there is a change in the 
system. Because our control systems are able to manage the power supplies of other 

MMU (Mobile Mining Unit)

UUC

MMUMMU

MMU MMU

communication
components

power supply
components

mining rack
group 1

mining rack
group 2

mining rack
group 3

mining rack
group 4

UMC

Figure	11.	Component	Overview	of	Unified	Unit	Control.



33

sub-systems including workers, the UUC automatically figures out which control system 
is responsible for which power supply. This automation is the last step to ensure absolute 
modularity. 

Racks, mining workers, and even new monitoring systems can be placed in the MMU without 
any further configuration and will be smoothly integrated into the whole ecosystem by the 
UUC and its automated initialization. Assembling MMUs likewise becomes much cheaper 
as processes are further streamlined.

REDUNDANCY

To prevent a single point of failure, the UUC runs in two different instances in the MMU. 
One of them is the master while the other is in slave (failover) mode.

Whenever one of them fails, this failure will immediately be reported to the Unified Mining 
Cloud (UMC). If the master instance fails, the slave instantly becomes master to make sure 
the central unit remains operational. Should both UUCs experience issues, all connected 
workers will shut down automatically as a protective measure and only as a last (unlikely) 
resort.

control

control

control

control

control

control

control

controlcontrol

control

control control
UUC

(slave)
UUC

(master)

Figure	12:	Unified	Unit	Control.	Master-	Slave	configuration.



34

UNIFIED	MINING	CLOUD	(UMC)
The automated, decentralized management of Mobile Mining Units is carried out by the 
Unified Mining Cloud (UMC). The UMC is an application running in the cloud which 
aggregates all the information from UUCs. Frontends connected to the UMC like web-
based applications or mobile apps can watch, supervise and configure MMUs and their 
components.

Each Mobile Mining Unit reports its position, status and performance to the UMC. The 
UMC and its intuitive user interface (web application frontend) then aggregates the data 
and provides it to the user. This data contains historical data for all connected UUCs, as 
well.

The UMC can be further configured to match different scenarios, which is why user and 
role management will be expanded in the future. With the help of the UMC, admin users 
can change the configuration of mining workers, shut down or start systems, turn on / 
switch off power supplies of devices, or tune control systems without being anywhere near 
the MMU.

The UMC is built as a smart application, which helps to handle errors and failures gracefully, 
and is partially automated. Based on standard configurations for failures, it analyzes the 
current situation of the UUCs when status updates are obtained and starts error handling 
and recovery routines based on the severity of the error.

With the help of a built-in message system, messages are sent to the person responsible 
for the MMU whenever status changes happen, failures are handled, or when human 
supervision is needed. All of these features can be managed and configured in the user 
interface of the UMC.

UMC

MMU

MMU

MMU

Figure	13.	Unified	Mining	Cloud.	Worldwide	connection	of	MMUs	via	cloud.	



35

SMART	MINING	

One of the biggest advantages of running an application on top of UUCs in the cloud is 
to have a centralized point for main decisions. One main decision is which coin to mine. 
This decision is dependent on the following factors:

 • current coin price / exchange rate

 • difficulty factor

 • electricity price at location

 • hash algorithm

 • location and temperature situation

 • hardware generation of workers

These conditions need to be taken into account when making the decision to get the best 
return on investment. Smart mining is the result of an automated process maximizing the 
potential of these conditions in real time. The UMC frequently analyzes the current 
situation and switches to a suitable mining strategy. Since the decision is based on location, 
it will be made for each MMU separately. This can lead to different mining strategy clusters. 
The UMC can even run two strategies against each other to test which one is working 
better if this can not be accurately predicted (the resulting partition of workers is called 
clusters in our dashboard). 

Figure	14.	Smart	mining	clusters.	The UMC decides which coin is best to mine based on different conditions 
to ensure the best ROI.

mining cluster

mining
cluster

mining
clusterUMC

UUC

mining rack
group

mining rack
group

MMU

UUC

mining rack
group

mining rack
group

MMU

UUC

mining rack
group

mining rack
group

MMU



36

TECHNOLOGY

Just like the UUC application, the UMC is built using the Java programming language by 
our core development team.

The UMC is currently running decentralized in the cloud, embedded in Docker containers. 
In the future, we will run tests to operate the UMC on our own UUC instances to build 
our own cloud. This ensures that the software is running entirely on envion-controlled 
hardware. The UMC software is frequently updated by our continuous delivery pipeline. 
With top knowledge development cycles and processes, which can even be scaled and 
outsourced, we are able to speed up this development quickly.

UMC	ARCHITECTURE

The Unified Mining Cloud is designed as a multi-tier architecture that prevents data loss 
while introducing compartmentalization for security purposes and high-scalability for 
performance increases. During the initial deployment phase, the data routing and frontend 
tier will be running. Long-term storage and crypto-storage will be added as operations. The 
planned tiers are briefly displayed in the following section (see also figure Communication 
Architecture) and will be elaborated in the subsections to follow:.

1 Long-Term	Storage: Tier 1 will be realized as a distributed system across all 
MMUs where every MMU acts as an independent data center. Because MMUs 
will literally be distributed around the globe, it is extremely unlikely that a single 
event will affect all of our MMUs. As a result, we can achieve an extremely high 
degree of data safety. In addition, the available storage space can automatically 
scale according to application requirements.

2 Data-Routing: Tier 2 is security-relevant and will - at a later stage - run in 
envion’s own high-security data center. Its purpose is to distribute data to the 
correct frontend instances.

3 Frontends and Reduced Databases: Tier 3 is based on virtual machines designed 
to run on cloud-based hosting platforms. Our virtual machines are not bound to 
specific hardware requirements and do not require a lengthy installation process 
if we decide to switch the hosting configuration or location. Therefore, tier 3 
instances can be easily scaled, satisfying individual requirements.

MMU

data routing

DB and
frontend 

DB and
frontend 

crypto storage

long term storage

MMUMMU ...

Figure	15.	Communication	Architecture.	Dataflow	between	the	different	tiers.



37

4 Crypto Storage: Tier 4, known as Crypto Storage, will be located in envion’s 
high-security data center. It secures the private keys required for communication 
and encryption.

DATA-ROUTING

The data-routing layer is the main vantage point for all MMU data storage units. All 
transactions from MMUs are sent through our data-routing layer. A database within the 
data-routing layer contains information about which MMU is assigned to which owner 
or operator and routes messages accordingly. In addition to this functionality, data 
meant for long-term archiving is sent to our Envion Storage Blockchain (ESB). Moreover, 
the data-routing layer provides an interface for routing information directly between 
MMU and frontend instance processes. This interface is designed for the administration 
and maintenance of the MMUs.

FRONTENDS	AND	REDUCED	DATABASES

Each frontend is a web application that runs in combination with a reduced database. 
As the assignees authenticate against the frontend, authenticated and encrypted 
connections are required. As we implement a browser-based application, we use TLS 
connections for authentication and encryption. Server-side authentication is realised by 
means of standard TLS certificates. Enforcement of TLS secured connections, selection 
of secure ciphers, and additional precautions like HSTS prefetching are inherent 
attributes of this methodology.

As our Tier 4 Crypto Storage goes live, we will reduce the required trust in the cloud platform 
as TLS private keys will no longer be stored on the server, but in envion’s Crypto Storage. 
We use a feature in the TLS handshake to authenticate messages sent by the server. Both 
client and server perform a handshake upon connection, which includes a Diffie-Hellman 
key exchange to generate a shared ephemeral session key. One message in this handshake 
must be signed by the server in order to be authenticated by the client. Our server then 
forwards this message to the Crypto Storage where the message is signed and sent back. 
As a result we can initiate an authenticated connection between client and server without 
the server actually holding the certificate’s private key.

A reduced database is a regular database that contains a specific subset of data. Each 
assignee can be provided with his own instance. This design allows us to implement envion’s 
internal “Chinese wall” security policies if required12. This means we can separate data 
access within envion if clients or regulations require this and allows for better scalability 
overall. Everything runs inside of Docker containers. This gives us the opportunity to choose 
a specific system configuration at any time, meeting assignee-specific requirements. New 
instances can be set up quickly to be filled with data from the data-routing layer without 
manual effort, allowing rapid migration between instances and configurations.

The database contains further assignee-specific information such as login information 
(in secure form). This specifically includes a per-assignee, role-based, access model. The 
described usage of assignee-specific instances implements compartments so that a 
vulnerability in the application would only compromise the respective assignee’s data. This 
deliberately prevents assignee cross-data access issues.

When operational, the ESB encryption keys will be stored in memory only. The data-routing 
layer will distribute these keys on demand. The keys themselves will be stored in envion’s 
Crypto Storage as soon as it goes live. In this way, long-term key material will always remain 
in a confined and secure location. The communication between data routing and MMU is 



38

encrypted (see chapter Security, page 40 for details) 

CRYPTO	STORAGE

Crypto Storage will be the heart of envion’s infrastructure. It holds the private keys 
required for secure communication within the network and will be located in a specially 
secured facility. Our system design separates performance-critical and security-relevant 
components. This allows us to run specially hardened operating systems with extremely 
high security standards in the Crypto Storage without causing performance issues. We 
again enforce strict compartmentalization within our Crypto Storage. This ensures that 
keys for TLS connections, UMC-to-UUC communication, ESD storage encryption, and 
cryptocurrencies are kept strictly separated.

LONG	TERM	STORAGE

Long term storage will be implemented by our Envion Storage Blockchain (ESB). Each 
MMU includes a data storage unit and acts as full node in the ESB. All information that 
needs to be archived will be sent to the ESB and stored safely. The stored data will be 
encrypted (AES-256 CBC) in case a MMU is physically compromised.

ENVION	STORAGE	BLOCKCHAIN	(ESB)

The Envion Storage Blockchain (ESB) will be a private blockchain spanning across all 
MMUs. For this purpose each MMU will be equipped with a storage module that acts 
as a full node in the ESB. The ESB functions as a secure overlay network and is not 
accessible from outside envion. Communication is encrypted as described in the security 
section, Communication, page 42.

If data needs to be stored, the data-routing Tier posts the data to the ESB, similar to a 
transaction in Bitcoin. Consensus is, in this case, not reached by proof-of-work or proof-of-

MMU

MMU

data

data

data

data

data

blockblockblockblockblock

MMU

MMU

MMU

data pool

Figure	16.	Adding	Data	to	ESB. MMUs add data to the data pool for storage (dotted line) and pull data 
from the data pool (solid lines) and sign the resulting blocks (lower right). Signed blocks are appended to 
the global ESB.



39

stake, but threshold signature count. This means that a block is official if a preset number of 
nodes cryptographically have signed the block. The number of required signatures allows 
us to tune the initial replication factor in the system. To put it in a nutshell, this means that 
the number of required signatures is equivalent to the number of copies in the network 
until the data is considered safely stored. Over time, the data will propagate to all full nodes 
and reach maximum redundancy. Figure Adding Data to ESB gives an impression of the 
system design.

Building storage distribution directly into envion’s main assets has many benefits. First 
of all, storage capacity automatically scales with the business. Secondly, as the value of 
the stored data increases, the safety of the data scales automatically. The distributed 
and mobile nature of the MMUs also protects our data from natural disasters, given 
that the data is spread all around the globe. Due to our satellite uplink, data access is 
independent from destroyed landlines and blocked connections and can be maintained 
as long as the MMU has power supply.



40

SECURITY

Security of our community members as well as data safety and availability are core values of 
envion. From the very beginning, we have put significant effort into designing and delivering 
a secure platform. This starts with a professional software development lifecycle and is 
complemented by well-organized operational security. However, we do not stop here. Bugs 
in software do exist and human errors occur. As such, we always aim to design our systems 
in ways that limit the impact of possible future incidents.

MMU SECURITY
Since MMUs will be distributed around the globe, and are not fixed in a single location, 
we put a special emphasis on security. The core idea is to not only build a safe system but 
to mitigate the impact of hypothetical security breaches by design. This implies that the 
entire design within each MMU is based on strict compartmentalization. All contained 
components will be assigned to different compartments. These compartments are:

 • Communication

 • Mining Workers

 • Automated Cooling System

 • Automated Doorman System

 • Automated Security Module

 • Network

Following a security-in-depth-strategy, our system design exemplifies the 
compartmentalization concept. Our design is based on separation by virtualization. The 
first generation is based on off-the-shelf virtualization technology introducing separated 
compartments from the start. In later generations, we will migrate the host operating 
system to a microkernel platform. The microkernel then acts as trusted computing base 
(TCB), which forms an abstraction layer between hardware and software. Multiple virtual 

Figure	17.	Compartment	Interconnection. Communication between UMC, UUC and compartments with the 
UUC. All compartments are separated.

UMC

communication

UCC/mining aircondition surveillance access control network

encryption

long term storage



41

machines can run in parallel on top of the microkernel. Communication between virtual 
machines must be explicitly allowed by the TCB. The benefit of this design is such that even 
if one compartment is compromised, the other compartments will not be affected.

All communication between between UMC and UUC is encrypted (details see chapter 
Security - Communication). To strengthen security we have introduced an explicit 
encryption compartment. This compartment resides between the communication system 
and all other compartments. The communication compartment is connected to the internet 
and as such has the broadest surface for possible attacks. However, even if a breach of the 
communication compartment should occur, the key material is still secure in the encryption 
compartment. The resulting system design is depicted in figure 17 Compartment 
Interconnection.

NETWORK	LAYOUT
There is no need for intercompartmental communication aside from the encryption 
compartment. As such, each compartment, with the exception of encryption, will be 
assigned its own VLAN. As a result, a network breach would only allow access to one 
VLAN and not the entire MMU network. By default, the encryption compartment 
does not allow inter-VLAN communication. Outgoing connections will only be allowed 
through the encrypted communication channel, ending in envion’s network. Therefore, 
even if an attacker sUUCessfully compromises a component, they will not be able to 
exfiltrate any data via the network.

PHYSICAL	SECURITY
In addition to the perimeter security of each MMU, enforced by physical access 
restrictions and surveillance, we take additional precautions regarding system security 
and safety.

SYSTEM	AND	DATA	SECURITY

From the very beginning we deploy trusted platform modules (TPM) and secure boot 
whenever available. All data disks are encrypted and a removed disk is, as such, useless. 
In the first generation, passwords and keys will be stored within the MMU. The integrity 
of the system is enforced by signed executables. In future generations, we will introduce 
full disk encryption (including operating system). At this later stage, passwords will be 
stored outside of the MMU and will be provided on demand only. This securely locks 
the entire MMU, and especially our servers, until they are remotely activated by envion.

NETWORK	SECURITY

Supervision of the switch status is integrated into the UUC. The physical disconnection 
of cables or devices is strictly monitored and reported immediately. In future generations, 
an additional safeguard will be implemented. The safeguard will supervise connection 
status and disable switch ports if a cable was unplugged unintentionally. This prevents 
the introduction of additional network devices. If a service process is triggered, a 
service mode will be enabled that explicitly allows swapping equipment to be marked 
as defective.



42

UUC	UPDATE	SAFETY
An important goal of the IT-infrastructure design is to avoid a single point of failure. A 
major concern with regard to UUC update safety are failed system updates.  Our virtual 
compartment-based design allows us to mitigate this issue: If an update is scheduled, the 
TCB clones the running compartment and applies the patch to the clone. The TCB then 
attempts to start the clone and performs compartment-specific checks. As soon as all 
checks are passed sUUCessfully, the TCB switches over to the clone and terminates and 
removes the old version of the compartment. Even if the update process gets interrupted 
by a loss of power or any other reason, the TCB will always start a running configuration. An 
update process is depicted in figure 17 Update cycle of a compartment.

Updates of the TCB are extremely rare. If they are required, operational safety is provided 
by the two redundant UUCs running per MMU.

COMMUNICATION
Security and authenticity of communication between components is an essential security 
goal. The first generation will be based on an off-the-shelf VPN solution with public-
private key authentication. The VPN connection allows us, in contrast to HTTPS (SSL) 
connections, to tunnel all connections. To keep our infrastructure flexible, connections 
will use DNS names for address resolution. To mitigate resulting DNS-based attack 
vectors, we deploy Domain Name System Security Extensions (DNSSEC)

FUTURE	COMMUNICATION	SECURITY

For future generations we will migrate to our own encryption protocol, thereby further 
reducing code complexity and attack surface. Our protocol will feature long-term identity 
keys and ephemeral communication keys. Our protocol is based on the NaCl: Networking 
and Cryptography Library by the well-known cryptographers Daniel J. Bernstein, Tanja 
Lange and Peter Schwabe13. For authentication, we use Ed25519 public-private elliptic-
curve signatures. For encryption, we rely on symmetric authenticated encryption based 
on XSalsa20 (encryption) and Poly1305 (message authentication). 

For each connection, ephemeral communication keys are exchanged, which provides so-
called “forward secrecy”. This means that a compromised session key becomes useless as 
soon as the session ends. We implement the well-understood and widely-applied Diffie-
Hellman key exchange protocol to achieve the said properties. This protocol allows us to 

Figure	18.	Update	cycle	of	a	compartment. As long as not all checks are passed the original compartment 
remains active (green)

comp. A comp. A comp. A

comp. A comp. A* comp. A*

checks failed

patch appliedcloneupdated request checks passed



43

calculate secret keys from publicly readable messages. For authentication purposes, the 
key exchange messages are signed with the identity keys.

The message authentication (mac) built into NaCl allows the receiver to verify the 
integrity of each received message. Therefore, an attacker cannot alter messages in 
transit. This property requires the use of so-called “nonces” (numbers used once), which 
are sent alongside the encrypted messages. We implement nonces as counters for both 
communication partners. These counters are initialized by a bitwise comparison of the long-
term public keys. When the first different bit is found, the partner with a zero initializes its 
counter with zero, while the other partner initializes its counter with a one. Both increase 
their counter incrementally by two for each consecutive message.

In addition to the original purpose of the nonce, we also use it to prevent replay attacks. 
Each side stores the last received nonce and only accepts messages with higher nonces. 
Because we use TCP, message reordering or packet loss are not concerns. Therefore, 
only accepting higher nonces is not a problem in this application.

TAKING	OWNERSHIP	OF	UUCS
A newly installed UUC is assigned a private key as part of the primary initialization 
process. The corresponding public key is used as the unique identifier (UUCID) of 
this UUC throughout the system. It is specially stored in the UMC for authentication 
purposes. In addition, the public key of the UMC is installed in the UUC. From this point 
on, authenticated and encrypted communication is possible. We refer to this process as 
taking ownership of the UUC.

ACCOUNT	SECURITY
The security of our community members is one of envion’s highest values. We therefore 
take various precautions to keep our community secure. According to our core security 
strategy, we do not stop with a secure system but think ahead and plan for hypothetical 
incidents. As an example, we store passwords in such a way that, even if a password 
database should leak, accounts are still secure.

STORAGE	OF	PASSWORDS
All passwords in envion’s systems will be stored using state of the art security precautions. 
The goal in terms of password storage is to keep passwords safe even if a password leak 
should occur. To prevent rainbow table attacks, each password is stored in combination 
with a random salt (at least 24 byte). To cope with increasing computing power we 
introduce scrypt what allows us to tune the computational and memory requirements 
for an attack. For computational requirements, scrypt uses a keyed hash construction 
HMAC-SHA256 with a password and salt as inputs. Hashing is repeated multiple times 
which increases the runtime and slows down an attacker. In more detail we use password 
(p) and salt (s) as input for the hash function (H(salt,password)) in the first round resulting 
in: r1=H(s,p). In the n-th round r(n-1) is used as salt and the result is XORed with r(n-1) : rn= 
H(r(n-1),p) × r(n-1). For memory requirements, scrypt introduces random memory access 
on an encrypted block. On a practical level, the Salsa8 encryption algorithm is used to 
produce a stream of pseudo-random bits. When the stream reaches the preset length, 
bits are sampled from random positions and used as output. This forces an attacker to 
create a bit stream of the same size, thereby controlling his memory requirements. The 
number of hash iterations as well as the memory requirements will be increased over 
time to keep up with availability of resources will be increased over time to keep up with 
availability of resources.



44

TRANSACTION	AUTHENTICATION	NUMBERS	(TANS)

Password security cannot be solved entirely on the server side. The password has 
to be kept secret on the user side as well. However, this is known to be a common 
issue. In order to protect our community from unwanted actions, our system features 
transaction authentication numbers (TANs). TANs will be required for critical actions like 
the withdrawal of funds. We also plan to include an additional two-factor authentication 
by means of mobile TANs, software, or hardware security tokens.

USER	MONITORING

To further protect our community members, we track typical login behaviour (in 
conformance with privacy regulations and standards). If an anomaly is detected, actions 
can be taken. Possible reactions can include notifying the account owner, requiring a 
TAN for the next action, and locking the account temporarily. Monitoring includes but 
is not limited to:

 • Number of failed login attempts;

 • Monitoring of typical devices used;

 • Monitoring of typical countries or regions the user logs in from

DDOS MITIGATION
MMUs only initiate connections and do not listen for incoming traffic. Therefore, MMUs 
are not vulnerable to DDoS attacks in the first place. A possible vector is the saturation 
of MMU uplinks. However, the physical distribution of MMUs will be mimicked by their 
distribution across subnets. As a result, a DDos attack is very likely to only affect a small 
subset of MMUs.

Our server infrastructure is modularized and based on virtual containers. Static parts 
of our infrastructure are hosted by a content delivery provider that has state of the 
art DDoS mitigation in place. Dynamic parts of our infrastructure can easily be moved 
across hosters, evading DDoS traffic if necessary.



45

REMOTE MONITORING & MAINTENANCE

SYSTEM MONITORING
Huge hashing power needs to be monitored at all times. Incidents need to be reported, 
logged, evaluated and handled. Therefore, envion focuses on a concept of smart system 
monitoring.

FAILURES

Each component of the infrastructure will be monitored. If a component fails, it will be 
recognized by the respective higher unit, reporting the failure to the UMC. Each incident 
will be logged and evaluated. The higher the priority of the incident, as estimated by the 
UMC, the higher the priority of the error handling response. These error handlings are 
configurable and can, for example, be messages of a complex fault-handling chain. Page 
46 on the Smart Maintenance Concept goes further into detail about this.

THRESHOLDS

In addition to watching out for healthy statuses, the UUC and the UMC monitors 
important KPIs and treats certain cases. One example of such a case could be a decrease 
or increase in temperature; another would be if the hashrate behaves irregularly. The 
point at which a case is treated is defined by thresholds. We are planning to implement 
a so-called threshold management system.

The threshold management will take place inside the UMC. The thresholds are configured 
by default but can be changed manually if needed. If a component falls under a certain 
threshold, configurable operations are triggered automatically. These operations can 
be messages to certain responsible parties or system interventions like shutdowns or 
exclusions on the network layer. Two important examples are elaborated below.

HASHRATE

If the hashrate falls under a certain threshold, but the mining worker is responding with 
healthy messages, it leads to the assumption that somebody is stealing the hashing power. 
In a worst case scenario, an attacker could place himself in the middle of the system (e.g. 
a man-in-the-middle attack or compromised a component). This unlikely situation could 
occur when somebody gains access to the MMU and somehow connects to an active 
port on the switch and one of the VLANs of the switch. If such an improbable scenario 
were to take place, it would lead to the shutdown of the component and the exclusion of 
related parts from the network. An escalation of security on-site and for the supporter 
would also be triggered.

TEMPERATURE

As explained in the section about the Automated Cooling System (ACS), the temperature 
inside the MMU is monitored and controlled by the ACS, but it will also be reported to 
the UMC. If  certain thresholds are reached, the UMC is able to trigger select operations 
such as messages to remote hands or the shutdown of parts of MMU.



46

MOVEMENTS

Movements recognized by Automated Security Module (ASM) will be reported to the 
UMC. Only the UMC will know if the movements match with currently open maintenance 
cases (e.g.: supporter inside the unit) or if the movements happen unexpectedly. For the 
latter case especially, the UMC can start triggering exception handling or security alerts.

SMART	MAINTENANCE	CONCEPT
As described in the System Monitoring paragraph, the UMC supervises all MMUs and 
their components. This allows the UMC to make smarter decisions based on the error 
messages, their assessment and prioritization.

Therefore, the concept provides that each error message will be logged and evaluated. The 
evaluation could take the following parts into account:

 • error	type. Errors can be manifold. They could be failures, interruptions, hacking 
attacks or others, like threshold warnings. All these types will be prioritized.

 • component	type.	Depending on the type of the component (e.g.: Mining Unit, 
MMU or others) a natural priority level results.

 • number	of	components.	As more devices of a component type will fail, the higher 
the priority is.

 • number	of	MMUs	at	location.	Failures of MMUs or their components at the same 
location could be counted together. This leads to higher priorities.

 • cost	for	maintenance.	Depending on the location of the MMU and the contractual 
relationship to the supporter or agency, the cost per maintenance is different. The 
priority of errors can be adjusted by taking this into account.

 • component	version.	In some cases, errors of older versions of components will 
lead to lower priorities. This could ensure that maintenance processes will only be 
triggered when there are more of these errors.

The weights of these points will have default values but can be configured individually.

When the UMC has evaluated the error messages and prioritized the events, it will initiate 
the error handling. Handlings are based on prioritization and error type. The following table 
indicates some important errors and their classification:

LOW MIDDLE HIGH

failure message maintenance maintenance

maintenance	error message fatal fatal

security	issue message maintenance fatal

temperature	threshold message intervention intervention

hashrate	threshold message message maintenance

movement	threshold message maintenance fatal

Table	6.	Errors	and	error	classification.	Definition	of	errors,	degree	of	severity	and	resulting	handling	of	
the	error.	



47

The errors and the priorities lead to some type of handlings:

 • messages.	 Messages can be emails, SMS, Push-Notifications or any other 
technology to contact responsible persons. They are purely informative.

 • maintenance. Maintenance is a complex process in which supporters are requested 
to manually fix errors in the MMU. An example of this process will be given in the 
next chapter.

 • intervention.	An intervention will most likely be done by the system automatically. 
It is connected to a message to to inform a supervisor about the system intervention. 
During an intervention, components can be shutdown or network parts can be 
disabled, for example.

 • fatal.	Fatal classifies all handlings which need to be done by internal technical 
supporters with higher access. This type of handling typically needs deeper 
knowledge. However, humans can speed up processes if necessary to reduce 
overall costs. Errors leading to this type typically need some investigation to 
prevent recurrence.

EXAMPLE	MAINTENANCE	PROCESS
As an example to demonstrate the smart maintenance concept, let’s assume that a rig 
partly fails (defective GPU) in an MMU. As described in the previous chapter, the number 
of failed GPUs needs to be above a location-specific threshold for the UMC to classify 
the failure as “MEDIUM” priority. In this example, the handling type will fall into 
maintenance. In maintenance mode, the UMC will automatically trigger messages to 
supporters next to MMU’s location. These supporters are partners onboarded by 
envion. They can be external individuals, agencies or internal support staff.

Depending on which components failed, the UMC will automatically trigger production and 
shipping of these components to the support partner if the partner does not already have 
them in stock (normal scenario). For first MMU deployment scenarios, envion will deploy a 
sufficient number of MMUs in one location to warrant at least one dedicated supporter per 
location to test service routines and operations.

Once the partner has received the components and starts maintenance, the UMC will 
generate a one-time pass for the ADS. This pass can be used by the employee only once 
(and with time restrictions), to gain access to the MMU. When the employee enters the 
code into the ADS, the UMC will shutdown the affected components if this has not already 

failure

MMU

maintainer

UMC

Figure	19.	UMC	Maintenance	process.	From	MMU	failure	to	solution.



48

been done. Since the rigs have partly failed in our example, this shutdown is necessary. 
When the employee enters the MMU, the ASM will monitor the procedure. The employee 
will change the affected GPUs (as indicated by red LEDs) and initialize them via mobile app 
or a responsive web interface to begin the status check. To standardize service operations, 
several components like GPUs and riser cards are always exchanged together (the 
defective component is identified at a later stage). If all components start without errors, 
the technician can leave the MMU. Otherwise, depending on the failure, other procedures 
will be initialized. The graphic below illustrates the flow of process.



49

ENVION MINING EXCELLENCE

HARDWARE	OPTIMIZATION	PROCESS
Our emphasis lies in creating a process of efficiently configuring our hardware to the 
optimal point of operation. We have invested heavily in analyzing, testing and configuring 
different kinds of hardware so that we can uphold flexibility regarding the choice of 
what the market has to offer in the future. The most important goal for our endeavor 
was to reach an efficient way to quickly ascertain the optimal configuration and thus the 
value of a given component (design of processes). Thanks to this established process, we 
are now able to react to the supply- and cost factors in a flexible manner.

Our findings show that even though there are graphic cards more suitable for the task, 
which are evidently also those facing high demand, shortages and increasing prices, a 
deeper analysis is needed to assess the total life-time efficiency of a GPU (driven by factors 
such as effective price tag, its power consumption, reliability and cooling capabilities). These 
driving factors are key in deciding which hardware component is currently the optimal 
choice for GPU-based mining operations.

Due to our experience in assessing not only popular but also niche products, we are now 
able to react to the availability of supply, in contrast to some of our competitors who focus 
almost entirely on the hashing power of GPUs, which is neither reasonable nor scalable to a 
sufficient extent. Note that this bespoken flexibility will not result in significant variances of a 
mining worker’s output; total hashing output will stay within a constant array, guaranteeing 
that there are no significant variations in hashing power of the MMUs, unless desired.

HARDWARE	ASSESSMENT	AND	CATEGORIZATION	

The assessment and categorization of mining hardware, especially GPUs, has been 
applied to a broad variety of products, including those which are not considered to 
be suitable for mining by popular belief. Now, this popular belief does not account for 
aspects that are crucial when scaling a mining operation to a high level, for instance 
price-energy consumption ratios, supply availability, cooling, robustness of components, 
product lifespan, or maintenance intensity. Also, most openly available assessments of 
a specific GPU’s energy consumption merely focus on Thermal Design Power, and thus 
the maximal performance the chip can deliver, meaning that benchmarks are usually 
done in idle- or full-performance states, neither of which applies to GPU mining. This, 
however, is not satisfactory for large-scale mining operations, which require a careful 
planning of power balances to assure low maintenance requirements. Therefore, 
envion decided to build an in-house testing laboratory for hardware benchmarking and 
has developed a technique to measure energy output at all in- and output locations 
of any GPU. These measurements flow into an assessment matrix, which computes 
the efficiency and eligibility of the component in question. This method gives envion 
a competitive advantage, because envion can react to supply and demand with high 
adaptability

Hardware assessment furthermore includes measuring hashing power. There are quite 
a few points which have to be taken into account as a GPU’s hashing power depends on 
several aspects like the possibility to manipulate memory timings, for instance, which is 
dependent on the memory manufacturer and has a great influence on hashing power. 



50

A precise measurement of hashing power is achieved by means of an iterative 
process involving asymptotic approximation, where the GPU is brought to its absolute 
performance limit, while maintaining stability. This process leads to a point of maximum 
operability. The point of maximum operability does not necessarily correlate with hash 
rates reported by competitors and online sources. The reason for this is that many 
competitors and online sources usually do not account for long-term stability, which is 
a crucial aspect for low-maintenance MMUs (Mobile Mining Units) and, in fact, has a 
higher priority than peak performance hash rates. As a result, not only do we overclock, 
which is a common practice, but we also go into much further detail, namely changing 
the bios of the GPU, including changes in the memory timings (“memshift”), component 
names (flashing a unique identifier on every GPU ensures that every card is identifiable 
in our MMU to facilitate service operations), clock rates, etc. This is all achieved in 
envion’s specially-designed hardware laboratory, where all eligible GPUs on the market 
are assessed. 

The previously described assessment tools thus lead to a categorisation of the majority of 
hardware eligible for mining and give guidelines on how to react to market supply in order 
to guarantee the stable performance of MMUs.

SMART	MINING	OPERATIONS

COIN	SWITCHING	-	IMPERATIVE	FOR	LONG-TERM	PROFITABILITY

Since the cryptocurrency market has proven to be volatile, envion has developed 
mechanisms that hedge against the risk of volatility and ensure investment returns 
with long-term prospects. This is highlighted even more by the current development 
of Ethereum, which is likely to head towards a proof of stake concept with reduced 
mining profitability. The incoming hard forks coupled with ice age could mean that it is 
more profitable to mine a different coin. The structure of envion is highly adaptable in 
this aspect - deciding which coin is mined will occur automatically based on algorithms 
calculating the most profitable coin to mine, or will be based on individual preferences. 

The importance of such flexibility is highlighted by an analysis of the projected difficulties in 
Ethereum (see graph); here, it becomes clear that mining Ethereum will not remain profitable 
over the long term, which is shown by the projected exponential increase of mining difficulty 
and the corresponding decrease of mining rewards. This is furthermore visualized by the 
so-called “difficulty bomb”, which was delayed by the Byzantium hardfork by 42mil seconds 
(approx. 1.4 years). Assuming an average block time between 10 and 19 seconds, the 
difficulty will remain constant for that amount of time. After the besaid 1.4 years, the 

Figure	20.	Energy	Consumption	Assessment	Matrix	(ECAM).



51

“difficulty bomb” will start to increase ETH mining difficulty every 10^3 blocks, making it 
virtually impossible to mine new blocks. In our model, we assume the block time to be 
constant, which yields a lower bound scenario. Thus, when building a long-term mining 
operation, flexibility with regard to coin choice is key.

The above model visualizes only the difficulty change invoked by the “difficulty bomb”, but 
not the difficulty change tendency though increased network hash rate. The Ethereum 
difficulty increases when the network hash rate increases, but the difference to the model 
is negligible.

Next to mining difficulty and rewards, the current exchange rate of the mined coin is 
decisive for a sound decision regarding which coin to mine. The following graph shows an 
approximate prognosis for the ETH/USD course, highlighting that there is a significant 
amount of volatility involved. Using the historic Ethereum price data we fit an Ornstein–
Uhlenbeck process to model the future price development of Ethereum. The Ornstein–
Uhlenbeck process was proposed by Uhlenbeck and Ornstein in 1930 and is an adaption 
of Brownian Motion, which models the movement of a free particle through liquid and was 
first developed by Albert Einstein. It satisfies the stochastic differential equation,

dX(t) = θ(μ − X(t)) dt + σ dB(t)

where B(t) is standard Brownian Motion, θ > 0 is the rate of mean reversion, μ is the 
equilibrium level and σ > 0 is the average magnitude of the random fluctuations that are 
modelled as Brownian motions. This gives the following prognosis for a ETH/USD price 
chart (which, naturally, does not account for externalities, and is therefore not to be seen as 
a binding statement).

Figure	21.	Projection	of	ETH	Difficulty	Growth. 
block_diff = parent_diff + parent_diff // 2048 * max (1 - (block_timestamp) // 10, -99) + int(2**(block.number // 100000) - 2)) }

2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

Figure	22.	Estimation	of	USD/ETH	Rate.	Based	on	an	Ornstein–Uhlenbeck	process.
days

USD



52

As mentioned earlier, there are several factors to take into account when deciding which 
coin to mine. There might be periods where, for instance, Ethereum is undisputedly the 
most profitable coin, while in other periods this decision could be prone to change on a daily 
basis.

APPLICATION	OF	COIN	SWITCHING

Our MMUs are able to mine all of the most common mining algorithms (GPU-based 
workers). Examples of what are MMUs can mine include Ethash, CryptoNight and 
Equihash, as well as the important Blake algorithm which enables the ability to dual-mine 
two coins simultaneously.  With each of those mining algorithms, it is possible to mine 
a variety of coins, giving us a lot of flexibility in terms of which coin we can mine at any 
given time. Furthermore, our algorithms track the mining performance of each mining 
algorithm to determine the mining profit of all available coins and their mining value in 
terms of revenue. If our real time analysis suggests that it would be more profitable to 
mine a different coin, the UUC is able to automatically command the MMU to mine the 
most profitable coin at that time without any maintenance effort by an operator. This 
enables us to react to the market quickly and ensures that we are not dependent only 
on the best mining option at a given moment.

DUAL	MINING

Envion has achieved operation of dual mining in a profitable setting. Dual mining, which 
means mining two coins on the same hardware component by utilising both core- 
and memory power, is often regarded to be unprofitable because it increases energy 
consumption to a significant extent. Due to the highly adaptable structure of the MMU 
project, envion is not bound to regular household- or industrial energy price levels, 
and can therefore offer dual mining in a profitable and stable setup, which will give 
an additional performance boost. Dual Mining can, of course, be enabled or disabled 
on demand, adhering to our claim of a high degree of adaptability and flexibility for 
all of envion’s mining operations and therefore the unique selling point of envion. In 
our testing lab, we have optimized hardware configurations for dual mining and can 
command an MMU to switch to these configurations instantly.

SCALABILITY	WITH	REGARD	TO	MINING	REWARDS

The current go-to solution for small-scale miners nowadays is to pool resources and 
share processing power with other small-scale mining operations. Here, individuals work 
together to solve a block, therefore increasing one’s chances to get a block reward, 
which is then shared with other miners at the cost of a fixed fraction of the reward, 
which is paid to the pool facilitator. With a sufficient quantity of MMUs, envion is able 
to eliminate common pool mining in favor of autonomously mining blocks in their own 
pool, ultimately ridding the envion community of the vexing fees that are usually paid to 
the facilitator as well as ridding the community from having to share their proceedings 
with individuals outside of the envion network. Instead, the envion community will pool 
their internal resources to solve blocks and share the rewards.



53

COMPANY STRUCTURE

Envion AG is a Swiss corporation, headquartered in Zug, the so-called “Crypto Valley” of 
Switzerland, where players like Ethereum Project, Monetas, Bitcoin Swiss and Bancor have 
laid the foundations for a major blockchain cluster.

Our structure is very simple: Shareholders are the founders, nobody else. This in turn 
means that we don’t have to satisfy the hunger of institutional investors for returns and 
can share the profits of our operations with our token holders in a fair and transparent way. 

Operations are run by the team of founders (see “Team”). On the supervisory board 
(“Verwaltungsrat”) are co-founder Matthias Woestmann and Cyrill Staeger, who will handle 
administrative tasks. We view the community of token holders in this context as a pool of 
know-how and a provider of impulses for envion to operate in sync.

After the ICO, we will found a 100% subsidiary for R&D and the management of container 
production: envion technologies GmbH, located in the German blockchain capital of Berlin. 

TEAM
Matthias Woestmann:  an investor in renewable energies since the early 2000s. 
Woestmann financed the Berlin-based solar module producer SOLON AG, which 
became one of the leading German module producers. His investment vehicle Quadrat 
Capital GmbH has also invested in technology and service startups in Berlin. He is an 
expert in energy markets not only in Germany, but across Europe and beyond.

Jasper Hellmann: a serial entrepreneur and founder of several eCommerce companies. 
His expertise is in the field of social media marketing. Hellmann founded an eCommerce 
company in 2016 and scaled it up to 30m euros in revenue within 12 months.

Felix Krusenbaum: An IT-professional with over 6 years of experience as a strategy 
consultant at A.T. Kearney with a focus on digital, retail and eCommerce; 10 years of startup 
and programming experience; second career as a serial founder of startup companies.

Jonathan Koch: Software engineer with 10 years of experience as a team leader at Rocket 
Internet & wooga.

Emin Mahrt: C-level IT product and engineering manager; blockchain expert and advisor. 
CPO and Operations Manager to Aeternity Blockchain; deep knowledge in smart contracts; 
early adopter of blockchain and cryptocurrencies in 2012/13.

Nikita Fuchs: software engineer and expert for ethereum smart contracts; design and 
development of decentralized blockchain applications; smart contracts for finance, industry 
and NGOs; senior consultant to Astratum.com.



54

HISTORY

In 2015, Matthias Woestmann met an entrepreneur from the PV ecosystem, an 
experienced professional, co-founder of one of the largest solar companies in Germany 
and an experienced investor in PV parks globally. He complained about an investment in 
Chile that began as a landmark project for climate preservation. With financial support 
from the World Bank, the German state bank KfW and the Canadian Climate Change 
Program, the project was also hyped in the media as the first unsubsidized PV park in 
the world14.

Placed in the Atacama desert, the sunniest place on earth, it sold electricity to the 
booming copper mines in the Chilean north for $0.14/kWh. As the copper boom 
collapsed, the demand for energy plummeted - and with it the price of electricity. At 
$0.04/kWh, the once profitable PV park suddenly produced millions in losses per annum. 

As these events unfolded in Chile, global energy demand for cloud computing was 
increasing sharply and the niche world of crypto mining was growing in size. Once 
Matthias told his story to the other founders, they began to develop a vision: to connect 
the proliferation of renewables with the growing energy demands of crypto mining - 
and thereby help both industries solve their problems.

Two years of hard work followed. First, plans and visions were developed; then followed 
engineering and trial & error:

 • Concept and strategy development: creating the envion idea and approach 

 • Researching	of	energy	markets and potential future partners

 • Development	of	the	envion	control	hardware (custom developed circuit boards, 
energy components, monitoring systems, industry 4.0 automation)

 • Development	 of	 our	 proprietary	 cooling	 system: Planning, airflow and heat 
calculations, design, simulation, prototyping and construction of a self-regulating 
cooling system for the units

 • Hardware	optimization for underlying “mining” hardware to reduce the energy 
footprint

 • Preparation	 of	 the	 initial	 coin	 offering	 (ICO): website, white paper, smart 
contract development

2017 
mining	in	all 
environments

Jan 15th 2018 
worldwide 

exchange	listing

spring 2018 
MMU 

mass	production

2015 
first	generation 
mining	unit

Dec	15th	2017 
pre-sale 

start

Dec	17th	2017 
crowdsale 

start



55

GLOSSARY

AC Air Conditioning

ACS Automatic Cooling System

ADS Automated Doorman System

AES Advanced Encryption Standard

AG Joint-Stock Company

AIC Automated Internet Connection

AMI Advanced Metering Infrastructure

API application programming interface

ASICs Application Specific Integrated Circuit

ASM Automated Security Module

BTC Bitcoin

CAPEX Capital Expenditures

CPU Central Processing Unit

CSC certificate Civil Service Commission

DB Database

DDoS Distributed-Denial-of-Service

DHCP Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol

DNA Deoxyribonucleic Acid

DNS Domain Name System

DNSSEC Domain Name System Security Extension

ESB Envion Storage Blockchain

EIA US Energy Information Agency

EOS Envion Operating System

ETH Ethereum

EVN Envion Token

GDP Gross Domestic Product

GMT Greenwich Mean Time

GPU Graphics Processing Unit

HD High Power Density

HMAC keyed-hash message authentication code

HTTP Hypertext Transfer Protocol

HTTPS Hypertext Transfer Protocol Secure

ICO Initial Coin Offering

IEEE Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers

IP Internet Protocol

ISO International Organization for Standardization

KVA Kilo volt ampere

KW Kilowatts

kWh Kilo Watts per hour



56

LAMP Linux operating system, Apache Server, MySQL database, PHP

LED light-emitting diode

LNG Liquefied Natural Gas

LTE Long-Term Evolution

MD Medium Power Density

MMU Mobile Mining Unit

MWp Mega Watt peak

NGO Non-governmental organization

OECD Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development

P&L Profit and Loss Statement

PCB printed circuit board

PM post meridiem

PMO Proprietary Mining Operations

PO Proprietary Operations

PV Photovoltaic

R&D Research and Development

REST Representational State Transfer

ROI Return on Investment

SEC United States Securities and Exchange Commission

SES Smart Energy Sourcing

SSL Secure Sockets Layer

TAN Transaction Authentication Number

TPO Third-Party Operations

TWh Terra Watts per hour

UHD Ultra High Density

UMC Unified Mining Cloud

UMTS Universal Mobile Telecommunications System

US United States

USD US-Dollar

UUC Unified Unit Control

VPN Virtual Private Network

WIFI Wireless Local Area Networking



57

REFERENCES

1 „The Cloud begins with Coal“, Digital Power Group, 2013; the report was sponsored by the National Mining 
Association of the US in order to promote coal, but consumption figures are neutral regarding the source of 
energy
2 The Independent, http://www.independent.co.uk/environment/global-warming-data-centres-to-consume-
three-times-as-much-energy-in-next-decade-experts-warn-a6830086.html
3 Prof. Ian Bitterlin, http://www.independent.co.uk/environment/global-warming-data-centres-to-consume-
three-times-as-much-energy-in-next-decade-experts-warn-a6830086.html
4 https://www.techpowerup.com/234959/cryptocurrency-mining-consumes-more-power-than-17m-
population-country
5 https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_electricity_consumption
6 https://cleantechnica.com/2014/07/22/exponential-growth-global-solar-pv-production-installation/ ; 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Growth_of_photovoltaics
7 https://qz.com/953614/california-produced-so-much-power-from-solar-energy-this-spring-that-wholesale-
electricity-prices-turned-negative/.
8 https://www.solarplaza.com/channels/archive/11186/india-on-roll-to-be-a-solar-energy-super-power/
9 Hileman, Garrick and Rauchs, Michel, 2017 Global Cryptocurrency Benchmarking Study (April 6, 2017). 
Available at SSRN: https://ssrn.com/abstract=2965436 or http://dx.doi.org/10.2139/ssrn.2965436
10 https://www.theguardian.com/sustainable-business/2017/jul/13/could-a-blockchain-based-electricity-
network-change-the-energy-market
11 http://www.energycentral.com/c/iu/next-generation-smart-metering-ip-metering;  
https://hbr.org/2017/03/how-utilities-are-using-blockchain-to-modernize-the-grid
12 Brewer, D.F. and Nash, M.J., 1989, May. The chinese wall security policy. In Security and privacy, 1989. 
proceedings., 1989 ieee symposium on (pp. 206-214). IEEE. URL: https://www.cs.purdue.edu/homes/ninghui/
readings/AccessControl/brewer_nash_89.pdf
13 https://nacl.cr.yp.to/
14 https://www.pv-tech.org/news/49_million_ifc_loan_paves_way_for_chile_pv_plant_expansion



58

APPENDIX - EXEMPLARY HARDWARE SPECIFICATIONS & KPI

Based on an exemplary MMU setup with ~50% ASIC- and ~50% GPU miners (split based on capex 
investment) and conservative estimates (e.g. no overclocking of GPUs), we have calculated the total ROI of 
envion’s proprietary mining operations to be 181% (based on current market conditions as detailed in table 
1). This estimate is based on the current mining difficulty and takes into account hardware power inflation 
(e.g. newer GPUs are introduced that are more efficient) and hardware defects (e.g. hardware failures of 
GPUs) - compare assumption A7.

This number is based on a set of assumptions:

# BACKGROUND	ASSUMPTIONS VALUE

A1 ETH/USD	rate(conservative	number	based	on	data	from	the	24th	of	November	2017) $400

A2 BTC/USD	rate(conservative	number	based	on	data	from	the	24th	of	November	2017) $8,000

A3 Average	local	energy	price $0.03

A4 Share	of	raised	ICO	capital	invested	into	MMUs(refer	to	white	paper	for	details) 91%

A5 Total	number	of	MMUs	in	operation(relevant	for	calculation	of	overhead	share	per	MMU)
1003 
(~$90,974k	investment)

A6 Contributor	token	share 5 6 83%

A7 Depreciation	of	mining	efficiency	(due	to	GPU	power	inflation,	hardware	defects,	etc.) 7
20%	(GPU	mining)	
25%	(ASIC	mining) 8

Table 1: Background assumptions

Detailed tables showing costs and earnings as well as key efficiency parameters can be found below. 
These tables should give first insights into the basis of ROI calculations (costs and benefits) as well as into 
the performance of an MMU in an exemplary configuration as indicated above. The model shown here 
is a simplified model of the envion operating model. The following model calculation consists of a mixed 
operation (50%/50% based on invested capital) of GPU and ASIC mining. It is important to recognize that 
this MMU configuration is hypothetical. It’s purpose is to best reflect a reality in which our operation will 
be split into GPU and ASIC mining - each operating in separate mobile mining units (one with 100% ASICs, 
one with 100% GPUs) as depicted in our whitepaper (this does not impact the business plan below). The 
purpose of the shown model below is to provide approx. performance indicators that best reflect the 
actual units that will be built. Please note that this configuration differs from the first generation that we 
have built (e.g. with 48 GPU-based mining rigs with 624 GPUs in total). Furthermore, the calculation is 
conservative and does not take overclocking of GPUs into account and is based on USD.

# COMPONENTS VALUE

C1 Total	number	of	mining	rigs	(currently	13	GPUs	each) 27

C2 Total	number	of	graphic	cards1 351

C3 Total	number	of	ASICs 27

Table 2: Components inside the 50%/50% configuration

# COMPONENT	PERFORMANCE VALUE

A1 Hashrate	per	ASIC 13.50	TH/s

A2 Monthly	revenue	per	ASIC2 $597.12

A3 Energy	consumption	per	ASIC 1,323	W



59

A4 Monthly	energy	cost	per	ASIC $28.97

A5 Monthly	profit	in	USD	per	ASIC2 $568.14

A6 MH/s	output	of	GPU	mining	rig	(not	overclocked) 149.5	MH/s

A7 Energy	consumption	of	GPU	mining	rig 840	W

A8 #	Graphics	cards	of	rig	(compare	C2) 13

Table 3: Individual component performance

KPI	# COMPONENT	PERFORMANCE VALUE

K1 Total	investment	in	MMU	including	mining	hardware3 $103,171.00

K2 Total	investment	in	GPU	mining	rigs	incl.	share	of	MMU9 $50,629.60

K3 Total	investment	in	ASIC	miners	incl.	share	of	MMU9 $52,541.40

K4 Investment	in	USD	per	ETH	MH/s 12.54	$/MH/s

K5 Investment	in	USD	per	BTC	TH/s 144.15	$/MH/s

K6 Investment	in	USD	per	KW 1.75	$/kW

K7 Total		GPU	hashrate	(ETH) 4,037	MH/s

K8 Total	ASIC	hashrate	(BTC) 364.50	TH/s

K9 Total	energy	consumption	of	MMU 59.10	kW

K10 Energy	consumption	in	kWh	/	month 43,144	kWh

K11 Energy	consumption	in	kW	per	ETH	MH/s 5.71	W/MH/s

K12 Energy	consumption	in	kW	per	BTC	TH/s 98.96	W/TH/s

K13 Total	annual	mining	profit $247,757.74

K14 Total	annual	GPU	mining	profit $78,119.17

K15 Total	annual	ASIC	mining	profit $169,638.57

K16 Profit	in	USD	per	kWh $0.48

K17 Profit	in	USD	per	MWh $478.55

K18 Raw	ROI4 240%

K19 ROI	with	83%	contributor	share5 199%

K20 ROI	with	91%	investment	share6 181.38%

Table 4: Key Performance Indicators (MMU configuration: ~50% ASIC miner share).



60

FIXED	COST	FACTORS FIXED	SETUP	COSTS (1	MMU)

F1 Housing $9,400.00

F2 Energy	Components $2,400.00

F3 Monitoring	Electronics $1,750.00

F4 Mining	Equipment $88,371.00

F5 Installation	&	Shipping $1,000.00

F6 Other $250.00

Total $103,171.00

Table 5: Fixed Costs per MMU (configuration: 50% ASIC miner share).

VARIABLE	COST	FACTORS MONTHLY RUNTIME COSTS  (1	MMU)

V1 Depreciation	(GPU	and	ASIC	power	efficiency	inflation,	hardware	defects,	etc.)7 $1,774.40

V2 Energy $1,294.31

V3 Local	Maintenance $150.20

V4 Security,	Land	Usage,	Monitoring $50.00

V5 Overhead $248.02

Total $3,516.92

Table 6: Variable Costs per MMU (configuration: 50% ASIC miner share).

APENDIX	DISCLAIMER
Cost structure as depicted in these table are based on an MMU with 50% GPU miners and 50% ASIC 
miners. The overhead calculation is based on assumptions that might be wrong or change, such as, but not 
restricted to, prices of third party services, levies and fees on crypto related activities, tariffs on computer 
hardware in various jurisdictions, expenses for litigation and settlements, changes in the regulatory 
environment, insurance for directors and officers, insurance for containers, costs of transport, changes 
in the supply chain, expenses for experts in production logistics, energy markets, data centers or other 
business segments. Therefore the costs for overheads displayed in this document provide only a rough 
guidance, but cannot be guaranteed by envion. The company is not liable for deviations from projections 
described herein and will not award any damages based on these projections. The above model shows 
the assumed return using an annual projected token profit based on a 25% reinvestment strategy and 
current mining difficulty & market conditions. Actual results can be higher or lower. The model is a sample 
calculation. The model should not be regarded as information for an investment in tokens or as an offer of 
or a solicitation to buy tokens. 

The calculations are according to the “use of proceeds” (as defined in the Whitepaper) of the envion ICO 
and the distribution of 83% of the tokens to investors. Calculations show the business case for the average 
investor (it does not take into account different token prices): It does not factor in the possible dilution 
effects of any rebates as scheduled for the four phases of the ICO (see our website www.envion.org).  In 
the private pre-sale ending on the 30th of November 2017 up to 6m EVN tokens will have been placed 
in order to finance the ICO and advancement of the envion business case (e.g. patent application). As the 
proceeds of this placement will not be invested in MMUs they also have a diluting effect on the payout. 
The dilution effect is not factored in the above projection because it depends on the size of the ICO.



61

All projections are calculated before taxes, which depend on MMU locations and and the question 
whether the payouts will be categorized as profits or costs by the jurisdictions of these locations. 
Therefore final payouts can deviate because of tax reasons.

APENDIX	REFERENCES
(1) We have tested multiple GPUs for our first generation mobile mining unit based on extensive testing 
performed as described in our Whitepaper (see chapter “Envion Mining Excellence”). The GPU model has 
been chosen based on cost/benefit ratios, supply/demand ratios, and energy usage among all viable mining 
GPUs. The chosen model is subject to change. The hardware model selected for MMUs will be determined 
at the time when component sourcing & procurement starts. 

(2) Compare https://www.coinwarz.com/calculators/bitcoin-mining-calculator/?h=13500&p=1323&pc=0.0
3&pf=0.00&d=1452839779145.92000000&r=12.50000000&er=8000&hc=0.00 for USD profitability)

(3) This includes housing, energy components, monitoring electronics, mining equipment, installation, and 
overhead

(4) This ROI resembles the raw ROI from operations. It does not take into account that 17% of all tokens 
are not distributed and does not take into account that only 91% of invested funds are invested into 
mobile mining units (the rest is spent for R&D and other company expenses)

(5) This ROI takes into account that only 83% of all tokens are distributed among investors (10% remain 
with folders, 5% in the company, 2% are reserved for the bounty program). The resulting ROI is one that 
an investor in the company would have if 100% of invested funds were to go directly into mining units 
(compare 91% investment share)

(6) This ROI takes into account that 91% of all invested funds after the ICO costs of 1.5m USD (already 
mostly raised at the time of writing and maybe fully raised at the time of ICO) are spent building mobile 
mining units and that 83% of tokens are distributed to investors. See also (4) and (5)

(7) We understand that there are widespread opinions in the mining community as to what the correct 
value for monthly depreciation is. We decided not to include uncertain factors like the future development 
of total network mining power into those numbers as there are countless models that try to make 
assumptions about the future development. Our numbers reflect only hardware defects and include a 
general yearly inflation of processing power efficiency as newer GPUs or ASICs come out. Positive effects 
like rising prices of cryptocurrencies (e.g. Ethereum or Bitcoin) or emerging of new, even more profitable 
cryptocurrencies are not taken into account in this calculation and offer additional growth potential for 
token holders or might at least compensate negative factors like difficulty increases. This means that 
envion token holders profit directly from positive market developments for cryptocurrencies. For full 
details, please refer to our Whitepaper

(8) A depreciation of 20% per year means that a full depreciation is expected after five years, a 
depreciation of 25% per year means that a full depreciation is expected after four years

(9) Investment includes share of MMU itself including share of electronics and labor

(10) The ROI shown on the envion homepage shows 161% per year which is an older number. We 
decided not to change the ROI on the website all the time but present very up to date numbers with 
this calculation. This calculation is more conservative but also some factors changed positively why the 
resulting ROI assumption is higher.


